Achaemenid Empire - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Etymology 
2 History Toggle History subsection 
2.1 Timeline 
2.2 Origin of the Achaemenid dynasty 
2.3 Formation and expansion 

2.3.1 5
50 s BC 

2.3.2 5
40 s BC 

2.3.3 5
30 s BC 

2.3.4 5
20 s BC 

2.3.5 5
10 s BC 

2.3.6 
5 th century BC 
2.4 GrecoPersian Wars 
2.5 Cultural phase and Zoroastrian reforms 
2.6 Second conquest of Egypt 
2.7 Fall to Alexander III of Macedon 
2.8 Descendants in later Persian dynasties 
3 Government Toggle Government subsection 
3.1 Coinage 
3.2 Tax districts 
3.3 Transportation and communication 
4 Military Toggle Military subsection 
4.1 Ethnic composition 
4.2 Infantry 
4.3 Cavalry 
4.4 Navy 
5 Culture Toggle Culture subsection 
5.1 Languages 
5.2 Customs 
5.3 Religion 
5.4 Women 
5.5 Architecture and art 
5.6 Tombs 
6 Legacy 
7 Rulers 
8 Gallery 
9 See also 
10 Explanatory notes 
11 References Toggle References subsection 
11.1 Sources 
12 Further reading 
13 External links Toggle the table of contents Achaemenid Empire 104 languages Afrikaans  Aragons Armneashti  Asturianu Azrbaycanca     Bnlmg      Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal  Cebuano etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Franais Gaeilge Galego  Hakkng  Hausa   Hrvatski Bahasa Indonesia slenska Italiano    Kriyl gwiyannen Kurd  Ladin Latina Latvieu Lietuvi Lingua Franca Nova Magyar  Malagasy  Mori     Bahasa Melayu  Nederlands   Norsk bokml Occitan Ozbekcha     Polski Portugus Qaraqalpaqsha Qrmtatarca Romn   Scots Shqip Simple English  Slovenina Slovenina    srpski Srpskohrvatski   Sunda Suomi Svenska Tagalog    tatara   Trke   Ting Vit Winaray    Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Ancient Iranian empire 550330 BC Persian Empire redirects here. For other uses see Persian Empire disambiguation. Achaemenid Empire  Xa 550 BC330 BC Standard of Cyrus the Greata The Achaemenid Empire at its greatest territorial extent under the rule of Darius the Great 522486 BC2345 Capital Babylon6 Pasargadae Cyrus the Great Ecbatana ceremonial Susa Darius the Great Persepolis ceremonial Common languages Old Persiana Aramaicb Akkadianc7 Elamite8 Greek9 Median10 see  Languages Religion Zoroastrianism official Mesopotamian religion11 Judaism Egyptian religion Greek religion see  Religion Government Monarchy Monarchsb  559530 BC Cyrus the Great  530522 BC Cambyses II  522522 BC Gaumata  522486 BC Darius the Great  486465 BC Xerxes I  465424 BC Artaxerxes I  424424 BC Xerxes II  424423 BC Sogdianus  423405 BC Darius II  405358 BC Artaxerxes II  358338 BC Artaxerxes III  338336 BC Arses  336330 BC Darius III Historical era Classical antiquity  Persian Revolt 550 BC  Conquest of Lydia 547 BC  Conquest of Babylon 539 BC  Conquest of Indus Valley 535518 BC  Conquest of Egypt 525 BC  European Scythian Campaign 513 BC  GrecoPersian Wars 499449 BC  Babylonian Revolts 484 BC  Corinthian War 395387 BC  Great Satraps Revolt 372362 BC  Second conquest of Egypt 343 BC  Fall to Macedonia 330 BC Area 500 BC1213 5500000 km2 2100000 sq mi Population  500 BC14 17 million to 35 million Currency Daric siglos Preceded by Succeeded by Median Empire Elam NeoBabylonian Empire Lydia Lycia Twentysixth Dynasty of Egypt Cyrenaica Gandhra Sogdia Massagetae Persis Macedonian Empire Twentyeighth Dynasty of Egypt a.  Official language and native language of the ruling class. b.  Official language and lingua franca.15 c.  Literary language in Babylonia. The Achaemenid Empire or Achaemenian Empire16 also known as the First Persian Empire17 kimnd Old Persian  Xa lit. The Empire18 or The Kingdom19 was the ancient Iranian empire founded by Cyrus the Great of the Achaemenid dynasty in 550 BC. Based in modernday Iran it was the largest empire by that point in history spanning a total of 
5.5  million square kilometres 
2.1  million square miles. The empire spanned from the Balkans and Egypt in the west West Asia as the base the majority of Central Asia to the northeast and the Indus Valley to the southeast.1213 Around the 
7 th century BC the region of Persis in the southwestern portion of the Iranian plateau was settled by the Persians.20 From Persis Cyrus rose and defeated the Median Empire as well as Lydia and the NeoBabylonian Empire marking the formal establishment of a new imperial polity under the Achaemenid dynasty. In the modern era the Achaemenid Empire has been recognized for its imposition of a successful model of centralized bureaucratic administration its multicultural policy building complex infrastructure such as road systems and an organized postal system the use of official languages across its territories and the development of civil services including its possession of a large professional army. Its advancements inspired the implementation of similar styles of governance by a variety of later empires.21 By 330 BC the Achaemenid Empire was conquered by Alexander the Great an ardent admirer of Cyrus the conquest marked a key achievement in the thenongoing campaign of his Macedonian Empire.2223 Alexanders death marks the beginning of the Hellenistic period when most of the fallen Achaemenid Empires territory came under the rule of the Ptolemaic Kingdom and the Seleucid Empire both of which had emerged as successors to the Macedonian Empire following the Partition of Triparadisus in 321 BC. Hellenistic rule remained in place for almost a century before the Iranian elites of the central plateau reclaimed power under the Parthian Empire.20 Etymologyedit The Achaemenid Empire borrows its name from the ancestor of Cyrus the Great the founder of the empire Achaemenes. The term Achaemenid means of the family of the AchaemenisAchaemenes Old Persian  romanized Haxmani24 a bahuvrihi compound translating to having a friends mind.25 Achaemenes was himself a minor seventhcentury ruler of the Anshan in southwestern Iran and a vassal of Assyria.26 Around 850 BC the original nomadic people who began the empire called themselves the Parsa and their constantly shifting territory Parsua for the most part localized around Persis.20 The name Persia is a Greek and Latin pronunciation of the native word referring to the country of the people originating from Persis Old Persian  romanized Prsa.26 The Persian term  Xa literally meaning The Kingdom19 was used to refer to the Empire formed by their multinational state.27 Historyedit Timelineedit Dates are approximate consult particular article for details Origin of the Achaemenid dynastyedit Main articles Achaemenes Teispids and Achaemenid family tree Family tree of the Achaemenid rulers. The Persian nation contains a number of tribes as listed here. ...  the Pasargadae Maraphii and Maspii upon which all the other tribes are dependent. Of these the Pasargadae are the most distinguished they contain the clan of the Achaemenids from which spring the Perseid kings. Other tribes are the Panthialaei Derusiaei Germanii all of which are attached to the soil the remainderthe Dai Mardi Dropici Sagarti being nomadic. Herodotus Histories 
1.1 01  125 The Achaemenid Empire was created by nomadic Persians. The Persians were Iranian people who arrived in what is today Iran c.1000 BC and settled a region including northwestern Iran the Zagros Mountains and Persis alongside the native Elamites.28 The Persians were originally nomadic pastoralists in the western Iranian Plateau. The Achaemenid Empire may not have been the first Iranian empire as the Medes another group of Iranian people possibly established a shortlived empire when they played a major role in overthrowing the Assyrians.29 The Achaemenids were initially rulers of the Elamite city of Anshan near the modern city of Marvdasht30 the title King of Anshan was an adaptation of the earlier Elamite title King of Susa and Anshan.31 There are conflicting accounts of the identities of the earliest Kings of Anshan. According to the Cyrus Cylinder the oldest extant genealogy of the Achaemenids the kings of Anshan were Teispes Cyrus I Cambyses I and Cyrus II also known as Cyrus the Great who founded the empire.30 The later Behistun Inscription written by Darius the Great claims that Teispes was the son of Achaemenes and that Darius is also descended from Teispes through a different line but no earlier texts mention Achaemenes.32 In Herodotus Histories he writes that Cyrus the Great was the son of Cambyses I and Mandane of Media the daughter of Astyages the king of the Median Empire.33 Formation and expansionedit Further information Wars of Cyrus the Great First Achaemenid conquest of Egypt Achaemenid invasion of the Indus Valley and European Scythian campaign of Darius I Map of the expansion process of Achaemenid territories 5
50 s BCedit Cyrus revolted against the Median Empire in 553 BC and in 550 BC succeeded in defeating the Medes capturing Astyages and taking the Median capital city of Ecbatana.343536 Once in control of Ecbatana Cyrus styled himself as the successor to Astyages and assumed control of the entire empire.37 By inheriting Astyages empire he also inherited the territorial conflicts the Medes had had with both Lydia and the NeoBabylonian Empire.38 5
40 s BCedit King Croesus of Lydia sought to take advantage of the new international situation by advancing into what had previously been Median territory in Asia Minor.3940 Cyrus led a counterattack which not only fought off Croesus armies but also led to the capture of Sardis and the fall of the Lydian Kingdom in 546 BC.41
42 c Cyrus placed Pactyes in charge of collecting tribute in Lydia and left but once Cyrus had left Pactyes instigated a rebellion against Cyrus.424344 Cyrus sent the Median general Mazares to deal with the rebellion and Pactyes was captured. Mazares and after his death Harpagus set about reducing all the cities which had taken part in the rebellion. The subjugation of Lydia took about four years in total.45 When the power in Ecbatana changed hands from the Medes to the Persians many tributaries to the Median Empire believed their situation had changed and revolted against Cyrus.46 This forced Cyrus to fight wars against Bactria and the nomadic Saka in Central Asia.47 During these wars Cyrus established several garrison towns in Central Asia including the Cyropolis.48 The Bible recounts Cyruss liberation of the Israelites held captive in Babylon allowing them to resettle and rebuild Jerusalem 5
30 s BCedit Nothing is known of PersiaBabylon relations between 547 and 539 BC but it is likely that there were hostilities between the two empires for several years leading up to the war of 540539 BC and the Fall of Babylon.49 In October 539 BC Cyrus won a battle against the Babylonians at Opis then took Sippar without a fight before finally capturing the city of Babylon on 12 October where the Babylonian king Nabonidus was taken prisoner.504951 Upon taking control of the city Cyrus depicted himself in propaganda as restoring the divine order which had been disrupted by Nabonidus who had promoted the cult of Sin rather than Marduk525354 and he also portrayed himself as restoring the heritage of the NeoAssyrian Empire by comparing himself to the Assyrian king Ashurbanipal.555654 The Hebrew Bible also unreservedly praises Cyrus for his actions in the conquest of Babylon referring to him as Yahwehs anointed.5758 He is credited with freeing the people of Judah from their exile and with authorizing the reconstruction of much of Jerusalem including the Second Temple.5759 Cyrus the Greats tomb located at Pasargadae 5
20 s BCedit In 530 BC Cyrus died presumably while on a military expedition against the Massagetae in Central Asia. He was succeeded by his eldest son Cambyses II while his younger son Bardiyad received a large territory in Central Asia.6263 By 525 BC Cambyses had successfully subjugated Phoenicia and Cyprus and was making preparations to invade Egypt with the newly created Persian navy.6465 Pharaoh Amasis II had died in 526 and had been succeeded by Psamtik III resulting in the defection of key Egyptian allies to the Persians.65 Psamtik positioned his army at Pelusium in the Nile Delta. He was soundly defeated by the Persians in the Battle of Pelusium before fleeing to Memphis where the Persians defeated him and took him prisoner. After attempting a failed revolt Psamtik III promptly committed suicide.6566 Herodotus depicts Cambyses as openly antagonistic to the Egyptian people and their gods cults temples and priests in particular stressing the murder of the sacred bull Apis.67 He says that these actions led to a madness that caused him to kill his brother Bardiya who Herodotus says was killed in secret68 his own sisterwife69 and Croesus of Lydia.70 He then concludes that Cambyses completely lost his mind71 and all later classical authors repeat the themes of Cambyses impiety and madness. However this is based on spurious information as the epitaph of Apis from 524 BC shows that Cambyses participated in the funeral rites of Apis styling himself as pharaoh.72 Following the conquest of Egypt the Libyans and the Greeks of Cyrene and Barca in presentday eastern Libya Cyrenaica surrendered to Cambyses and sent tribute without a fight.6566 Cambyses then planned invasions of Carthage the oasis of Ammon and Ethiopia.73 Herodotus claims that the naval invasion of Carthage was canceled because the Phoenicians who made up a large part of Cambyses fleet refused to take up arms against their own people74 but modern historians doubt whether an invasion of Carthage was ever planned at all.65 However Cambyses dedicated his efforts to the other two campaigns aiming to improve the Empires strategic position in Africa by conquering the Kingdom of Mero and taking strategic positions in the western oases. To this end he established a garrison at Elephantine consisting mainly of Jewish soldiers who remained stationed at Elephantine throughout Cambyses reign.65 The invasions of Ammon and Ethiopia themselves were failures. Herodotus claims that the invasion of Ethiopia was a failure due to the madness of Cambyses and the lack of supplies for his men75 but archaeological evidence suggests that the expedition was not a failure and a fortress at the Second Cataract of the Nile on the border between Egypt and Kush remained in use throughout the Achaemenid period.6576 The events surrounding Cambysess death and Bardiyas succession are greatly debated as there are many conflicting accounts.61 According to Herodotus as Bardiyas assassination had been committed in secret the majority of Persians still believed him to be alive. This allowed two Magi to rise up against Cambyses with one of them sitting on the throne able to impersonate Bardiya because of their remarkable physical resemblance and shared name Smerdis in Herodotuss accountsd.77 Ctesias writes that when Cambyses had Bardiya killed he immediately put the magus Sphendadates in his place as satrap of Bactria due to a remarkable physical resemblance.78 Two of Cambyses confidants then conspired to usurp Cambyses and put Sphendadates on the throne under the guise of Bardiya.79 According to the Behistun Inscription written by the following king Darius the Great a magus named Gaumata impersonated Bardiya and incited a revolution in Persia.60 Whatever the exact circumstances of the revolt Cambyses heard news of it in the summer of 522 BC and began to return from Egypt but he was wounded in the thigh in Syria and died of gangrene so Bardiyas impersonator became king.
80 e The account of Darius is the earliest and although the later historians all agree on the key details of the story that a magus impersonated Bardiya and took the throne this may have been a story created by Darius to justify his own usurpation.82 Iranologist Pierre Briant hypothesises that Bardiya was not killed by Cambyses but waited until his death in the summer of 522 BC to claim his legitimate right to the throne as he was then the only male descendant of the royal family. Briant says that although the hypothesis of a deception by Darius is generally accepted today nothing has been established with certainty at the present time given the available evidence.83 The Achaemenid Empire at its greatest extent c.500 BC According to the Behistun inscription Gaumata ruled for seven months before being overthrown in 522 BC by Darius the Great Old Persian Dryavu who holds firm the good also known as Darayarahush. The Magi though persecuted continued to exist and a year following the death of the first pseudoSmerdis Gaumata saw a second pseudoSmerdis Vahyazdta attempt a coup. The coup though initially successful failed.84 Herodotus writes85 that the native leadership debated the best form of government for the empire. 5
10 s BCedit Ever since the Macedonian king Amyntas I surrendered his country to the Persians in about 512511 Macedonians and Persians were strangers no more as well. The subjugation of Macedonia was part of Persian military operations initiated by Darius the Great 521486 in 5
13 after immense preparationsa huge Achaemenid army invaded the Balkans and tried to defeat the European Scythians roaming to the north of the Danube river.86 Darius army subjugated several Thracian people and virtually all other regions that touch the European part of the Black Sea such as parts of modern Bulgaria Romania Ukraine and Russia before it returned to Asia Minor.8687 Darius left in Europe one of his commanders named Megabazus whose task was to accomplish conquests in the Balkans.86 The Persian troops subjugated goldrich Thrace the coastal Greek cities and defeated and conquered the powerful Paeonians.868889 Finally Megabazus sent envoys to Amyntas demanding acceptance of Persian domination which the Macedonians did. The Balkans provided many soldiers for the multiethnic Achaemenid army. Many of the Macedonian and Persian elite intermarried such as the Persian official Bubares who married Amyntas daughter Gygaea. Family ties that the Macedonian rulers Amyntas and Alexander enjoyed with Bubares ensured them good relations with the Persian kings Darius and Xerxes I who was also known as Xerxes the Great. The Persian invasion led indirectly to Macedonias rise in power and Persia had some common interests in the Balkans with Persian aid the Macedonians stood to gain much at the expense of some Balkan tribes such as the Paeonians and Greeks. All in all the Macedonians were willing and useful Persian allies. Macedonian soldiers fought against Athens and Sparta in Xerxes Is army.86 The Persians referred to both Greeks and Macedonians as Yauna Ionians their term for Greeks and to Macedonians specifically as Yaun Takabara or Greeks with hats that look like shields possibly referring to the Macedonian kausia hat.90 The Persian queen Atossa daughter of Cyrus the Great sisterwife of Cambyses II Darius the Greats wife and mother of Xerxes the Great 
5 th century BCedit By the 
5 th century BC the Kings of Persia were either ruling over or had subordinated territories encompassing not just all of the Persian Plateau and all of the territories formerly held by the Assyrian Empire Mesopotamia the Levant Cyprus and Egypt but beyond this all of Anatolia and Armenia as well as the Southern Caucasus and parts of the North Caucasus Azerbaijan Uzbekistan Tajikistan Bulgaria Paeonia Thrace and Macedonia to the north and west most of the Black Sea coastal regions parts of Central Asia as far as the Aral Sea the Oxus and Jaxartes to the north and northeast the Hindu Kush and the western Indus basin corresponding to modern Afghanistan and Pakistan to the far east parts of northern Arabia to the south and parts of eastern Libya Cyrenaica to the southwest and parts of Oman China and the UAE.91929394959697 GrecoPersian Warsedit Main article GrecoPersian Wars Map showing events of the first phases of the GrecoPersian Wars Greek hoplite and Persian warrior depicted fighting on an ancient kylix 
5 th century BC The Ionian Revolt in 499 BC and associated revolts in Aeolis Doris Cyprus and Caria were military rebellions by several regions of Asia Minor against Persian rule lasting from 499 to 493 BC. At the heart of the rebellion was the dissatisfaction of the Greek cities of Asia Minor with the tyrants appointed by Persia to rule them along with the individual actions of two Milesian tyrants Histiaeus and Aristagoras. In 499 BC the thentyrant of Miletus Aristagoras launched a joint expedition with the Persian satrap Artaphernes to conquer Naxos in an attempt to bolster his position in Miletus both financially and in terms of prestige. The mission was a debacle and sensing his imminent removal as a tyrant Aristagoras chose to incite the whole of Ionia into rebellion against the Persian king Darius I who was commonly known as Darius the Great.citation needed The Persians continued to reduce the cities along the west coast that still held out against them before finally imposing a peace settlement in 493 BC on Ionia that was generally considered to be both just and fair. The Ionian Revolt constituted the first major conflict between Greece and the Achaemenid Empire and as such represents the first phase of the GrecoPersian Wars. Asia Minor had been brought back into the Persian fold but Darius had vowed to punish Athens and Eretria for their support of the revolt.98 Moreover seeing that the political situation in Greece posed a continued threat to the stability of his Empire he decided to embark on the conquest of all of Greece. The first campaign of the invasion was to bring the territories in the Balkan peninsula back within the empire.99 The Persian grip over these territories had loosened following the Ionian Revolt. In 492 BC the Persian general Mardonius resubjugated Thrace and made Macedonia a fully subordinate part of the empire it had been a vassal as early as the late 
6 th century BC but retained a great deal of autonomy.99 However in 490 BC the Persian forces were defeated by the Athenians at the Battle of Marathon and Darius I would die before having the chance to launch an invasion of Greece.100 Achaemenid king fighting hoplites seal and seal holder Cimmerian Bosporus. Xerxes I 485465 BC Old Persian Xayra Hero Among Kings son of Darius I vowed to complete the job. He organized a massive invasion aiming to conquer Greece. His army entered Greece from the north in the spring of 480 BC meeting little or no resistance through Macedonia and Thessaly but was delayed by a small Greek force for three days at Thermopylae. A simultaneous naval battle at Artemisium was tactically indecisive as large storms destroyed ships from both sides. The battle was stopped prematurely when the Greeks received news of the defeat at Thermopylae and retreated. The battle was a tactical victory for the Persians giving them uncontested control of Artemisium and the Aegean Sea.citation needed Following his victory at the Battle of Thermopylae Xerxes sacked the evacuated city of Athens and prepared to meet the Greeks at the strategic Isthmus of Corinth and the Saronic Gulf. In 480 BC the Greeks won a decisive victory over the Persian fleet at the Battle of Salamis and forced Xerxes to retire to Sardis.101 The land army which he left in Greece under Mardonius retook Athens but was eventually destroyed in 479 BC at the Battle of Plataea. The final defeat of the Persians at Mycale encouraged the Greek cities of Asia to revolt and the Persians lost all of their territories in Europe with Macedonia once again becoming independent.86 Artabanus the commander of the royal bodyguard and the most powerful official in the Persian court assassinated Xerxes with the help of a eunuch Aspamitres.102 The exact year and date of Xerxes assassination is disputed among historians. Cultural phase and Zoroastrian reformsedit After Xerxes I was assassinated he was succeeded by his eldest surviving son Artaxerxes I. It was during his reign that Elamite ceased to be the language of governmentcitation needed and Aramaic gained in importance. It was probably during this reign that the solar calendar was introduced as the national calendar. Under Artaxerxes I Zoroastrianism became the de facto religion of the empire.citation needed After Persia had been defeated at the Battle of Eurymedon 469 or 466 BC103 military action between Greece and Persia was halted. When Artaxerxes I took power he introduced a new Persian strategy of weakening the Athenians by funding their enemies in Greece. This indirectly caused the Athenians to move the treasury of the Delian League from the island of Delos to the Athenian acropolis. This funding practice inevitably prompted renewed fighting in 450 BC where the Greeks attacked at the Battle of Cyprus. After Cimons failure to attain much in this expedition the Peace of Callias was agreed between Athens Argos and Persia in 449 BC.104105 Artaxerxes offered asylum to Themistocles who was the winner of the Battle of Salamis after Themistocles was ostracized from Athens. Also Artaxerxes gave him Magnesia Myus and Lampsacus to maintain him in bread meat and wine. In addition Artaxerxes I gave him Palaescepsis to provide him with clothes and he also gave him Percote with bedding for his house.106 Achaemenid gold ornaments Brooklyn Museum When Artaxerxes died in 424 BC at Susa his body was taken to the tomb already built for him in the Naqshe Rustam Necropolis. It was Persian tradition that kings begin constructing their own tombs while they were still alive. Artaxerxes I was immediately succeeded by his eldest and only legitimate son Xerxes II.107 However after a few days on the throne he was assassinated while drunk by Pharnacyas and Menostanes on the orders of his illegitimate brother Sogdianus who apparently had gained the support of his regions. Sogdianus reigned for six months and fifteen days before being captured by his halfbrother Ochus who had rebelled against him. Sogdianus was executed by being suffocated in ash because Ochus had promised he would not die by the sword by poison or by hunger.108 Ochus then took the royal name Darius II. Darius ability to defend his position on the throne ended the short power vacuum.citation needed From 412 BC Darius II at the insistence of Tissaphernes gave support first to Athens then to Sparta but in 407 BC Darius son Cyrus the Younger was appointed to replace Tissaphernes and aid was given entirely to Sparta which finally defeated Athens in 404 BC. In the same year Darius fell ill and died in Babylon. His death gave an Egyptian rebel named Amyrtaeus the opportunity to throw off Persian control over Egypt. At his death bed Darius Babylonian wife Parysatis pleaded with him to have her second eldest son Cyrus the Younger crowned but Darius refused. Queen Parysatis favoured Cyrus more than her eldest son Artaxerxes II. Plutarch relates probably on the authority of Ctesias that the displaced Tissaphernes came to the new king on his coronation day to warn him that his younger brother Cyrus the Younger was preparing to assassinate him during the ceremony. Artaxerxes had Cyrus arrested and would have had him executed if their mother Parysatis had not intervened. Cyrus was then sent back as Satrap of Lydia where he prepared an armed rebellion. Cyrus assembled a large army including a contingent of Ten Thousand Greek mercenaries and made his way deeper into Persia. The army of Cyrus was stopped by the royal Persian army of Artaxerxes II at Cunaxa in 401 BC where Cyrus was killed. The Ten Thousand Greek Mercenaries including Xenophon were now deep in Persian territory and were at risk of attack. So they searched for others to offer their services to but eventually had to return to Greece.101109 Artaxerxes II was the longest reigning of the Achaemenid kings and it was during this 
45 year period of relative peace and stability that many of the monuments of the era were constructed. Artaxerxes moved the capital back to Persepolis which he greatly extended. Also the summer capital at Ecbatana was lavishly extended with gilded columns and roof tiles of silver and copper.110 The extraordinary innovation of the Zoroastrian shrines can also be dated to his reign and it was probably during this period that Zoroastrianism spread from Armenia throughout Asia Minor and the Levant. The construction of temples though serving a religious purpose was not a purely selfless act as they also served as an important source of income. From the Babylonian kings the Achaemenids adopted the concept of a mandatory temple tax a onetenth tithe which all inhabitants paid to the temple nearest to their land or another source of income.111 Persian Empire timeline including important events and territorial evolution  550323 BC Artaxerxes II became involved in a war with Persias erstwhile allies the Spartans who under Agesilaus II invaded Asia Minor. To redirect the Spartans attention to Greek affairs Artaxerxes II subsidized their enemies in particular the Athenians Thebans and Corinthians. These subsidies helped to engage the Spartans in what would become known as the Corinthian War. In 387 BC Artaxerxes II betrayed his allies and came to an arrangement with Sparta and in the Treaty of Antalcidas he forced his erstwhile allies to come to terms. This treaty restored control of the Greek cities of Ionia and Aeolis on the Anatolian coast to the Persians while giving Sparta dominance on the Greek mainland. In 385 BC he campaigned against the Cadusians. Although successful against the Greeks Artaxerxes II had more trouble with the Egyptians who had successfully revolted against him at the beginning of his reign. An attempt to reconquer Egypt in 373 BC was completely unsuccessful but in his waning years the Persians did manage to defeat a joint EgyptianSpartan effort to conquer Phoenicia. He quashed the Revolt of the Satraps in 372362 BC. He is reported to have had a number of wives. His main wife was Stateira until she was poisoned by Artaxerxes IIs mother Parysatis in about 400 BC. Another chief wife was a Greek woman of Phocaea named Aspasia not the same as the concubine of Pericles. Artaxerxes II is said to have had more than 115 sons from 350 wives.112 In 358 BC Artaxerxes II died and was succeeded by his son Artaxerxes III. In 355 BC Artaxerxes III forced Athens to conclude a peace which required the citys forces to leave Asia Minor and to acknowledge the independence of its rebellious allies.113 Artaxerxes started a campaign against the rebellious Cadusians but he managed to appease both of the Cadusian kings. One individual who successfully emerged from this campaign was Darius Codomannus who later occupied the Persian throne as Darius III.citation needed Artaxerxes III then ordered the disbanding of all the satrapal armies of Asia Minor as he felt that they could no longer guarantee peace in the west and was concerned that these armies equipped the western satraps with the means to revolt.114 The order was however ignored by Artabazos II of Phrygia who asked for the help of Athens in a rebellion against the king. Athens sent assistance to Sardis. Orontes of Mysia also supported Artabazos and the combined forces managed to defeat the forces sent by Artaxerxes III in 354 BC. However in 353 BC they were defeated by Artaxerxes IIIs army and were disbanded. Orontes was pardoned by the king while Artabazos fled to the safety of the court of Philip II of Macedon. In c.351 BC Artaxerxes embarked on a campaign to recover Egypt which had revolted under his father Artaxerxes II. At the same time a rebellion had broken out in Asia Minor which being supported by Thebes threatened to become serious. Levying a vast army Artaxerxes invaded Egypt and engaged in fighting with Nectanebo II. After a year of fighting the Egyptian Pharaoh Nectanebo inflicted a crushing defeat on the Persians with the support of mercenaries led by the Greek generals Diophantus and Lamius.115 Artaxerxes was compelled to retreat and postpone his plans to reconquer Egypt. Soon after this defeat there were rebellions in Phoenicia Asia Minor and Cyprus.citation needed Darius vase The Darius Vase at the Archaeological Museum of Naples. c. 340320 BC. Detail of Darius with a label in Greek  top right giving his name. In 343 BC Artaxerxes committed responsibility for the suppression of the Cyprian rebels to Idrieus prince of Caria who employed 8000 Greek mercenaries and forty triremes commanded by Phocion the Athenian and Evagoras son of the elder Evagoras the Cypriot monarch.116117 Idrieus succeeded in reducing Cyprus. Artaxerxes initiated a counteroffensive against Sidon by commanding Belesys satrap of Syria and Mazaeus satrap of Cilicia to invade the city and to keep the Phoenicians in check. Both satraps suffered crushing defeats at the hands of Tennes the Sidonese king who was aided by 40000 Greek mercenaries sent to him by Nectanebo II and commanded by Mentor of Rhodes. As a result the Persian forces were driven out of Phoenicia.117 After this Artaxerxes personally led an army of 330000 men against Sidon. Artaxerxes army comprised 3000
00 foot soldiers 30000 cavalry 300 triremes and 500 transports or provision ships. After gathering this army he sought assistance from the Greeks. Though refused aid by Athens and Sparta he succeeded in obtaining a thousand Theban heavyarmed hoplites under Lacrates three thousand Argives under Nicostratus and six thousand olians Ionians and Dorians from the Greek cities of Asia Minor. This Greek support was numerically small amounting to no more than 10000 men but it formed together with the Greek mercenaries from Egypt who went over to him afterward the force on which he placed his chief reliance and to which the ultimate success of his expedition was mainly due. The approach of Artaxerxes sufficiently weakened the resolution of Tennes that he endeavoured to purchase his own pardon by delivering up 100 principal citizens of Sidon into the hands of the Persian king and then admitting Artaxerxes within the defences of the town. Artaxerxes had the 100 citizens transfixed with javelins and when 500 more came out as supplicants to seek his mercy Artaxerxes consigned them to the same fate. Sidon was then burnt to the ground either by Artaxerxes or by the Sidonian citizens. Forty thousand people died in the conflagration.117 Artaxerxes sold the ruins at a high price to speculators who calculated on reimbursing themselves by the treasures which they hoped to dig out from among the ashes.118 Tennes was later put to death by Artaxerxes.119 Artaxerxes later sent Jews who supported the revolt to Hyrcania on the south coast of the Caspian Sea.120121 Second conquest of Egyptedit Relief showing Darius I offering lettuces to the Egyptian deity AmunRa Kamutef Temple of Hibis The 24 countries subject to the Achaemenid Empire at the time of Darius on the Egyptian statue of Darius I. The reduction of Sidon was followed closely by the invasion of Egypt. In 343 BC Artaxerxes III in addition to his 330000 Persians had now a force of 14000 Greeks furnished by the Greek cities of Asia Minor 4000 under Mentor consisting of the troops that he had brought to the aid of Tennes from Egypt 3000 sent by Argos and 1000 from Thebes. He divided these troops into three bodies and placed at the head of each a Persian and a Greek. The Greek commanders were Lacrates of Thebes Mentor of Rhodes and Nicostratus of Argos while the Persians were led by Rhossaces Aristazanes and Bagoas the chief of the eunuchs. Nectanebo II resisted with an army of 100000 of whom 20000 were Greek mercenaries. Nectanebo II occupied the Nile and its various branches with his large navy.citation needed The character of the country intersected by numerous canals and full of strongly fortified towns was in his favour and Nectanebo II might have been expected to offer a prolonged if not even a successful resistance. However he lacked good generals and overconfident in his own powers of command he was outmaneuvered by the Greek mercenary generals and his forces were eventually defeated by the combined Persian armies. After his defeat Nectanebo hastily fled to Memphis leaving the fortified towns to be defended by their garrisons. These garrisons consisted of partly Greek and partly Egyptian troops between whom jealousies and suspicions were easily sown by the Persian leaders. As a result the Persians were able to rapidly reduce numerous towns across Lower Egypt and were advancing upon Memphis when Nectanebo decided to quit the country and flee southwards to Ethiopia.117 The Persian army completely routed the Egyptians and occupied the Lower Delta of the Nile. Following Nectanebo fleeing to Ethiopia all of Egypt submitted to Artaxerxes. The Jews in Egypt were sent either to Babylon or to the south coast of the Caspian Sea the same location that the Jews of Phoenicia had earlier been sent.citation needed After this victory over the Egyptians Artaxerxes had the city walls destroyed started a reign of terror and set about looting all the temples. Persia gained a significant amount of wealth from this looting. Artaxerxes also raised high taxes and attempted to weaken Egypt enough that it could never revolt against Persia. For the 10 years that Persia controlled Egypt believers in the native religion were persecuted and sacred books were stolen.122 Before Artaxerxes returned to Persia he appointed Pherendares as satrap of Egypt. With the wealth gained from his reconquering Egypt Artaxerxes was able to amply reward his mercenaries. He then returned to his capital having successfully completed his invasion of Egypt.citation needed After his success in Egypt Artaxerxes returned to Persia and spent the next few years effectively quelling insurrections in various parts of the Empire so that a few years after his conquest of Egypt the Persian Empire was firmly under his control. Egypt remained a part of the Persian Empire from then until Alexander the Greats conquest of Egypt.citation needed After the conquest of Egypt there were no more revolts or rebellions against Artaxerxes. Mentor and Bagoas the two generals who had most distinguished themselves in the Egyptian campaign were advanced to posts of the highest importance. Mentor who was governor of the entire Asiatic seaboard was successful in reducing to subjection many of the chiefs who during the recent troubles had rebelled against Persian rule. In the course of a few years Mentor and his forces were able to bring the whole Asian Mediterranean coast into complete submission and dependence.citation needed Bagoas went back to the Persian capital with Artaxerxes where he took a leading role in the internal administration of the Empire and maintained tranquillity throughout the rest of the Empire. During the last six years of the reign of Artaxerxes III the Persian Empire was governed by a vigorous and successful government.117 The Persian forces in Ionia and Lycia regained control of the Aegean and the Mediterranean Sea and took over much of Athens former island empire. In response Isocrates of Athens started giving speeches calling for a crusade against the barbarians but there was not enough strength left in any of the Greek citystates to answer his call.123 Although there were no rebellions in the Persian Empire itself the growing power and territory of Philip II of Macedon in Macedon against which Demosthenes was in vain warning the Athenians attracted the attention of Artaxerxes. In response he ordered that Persian influence was to be used to check and constrain the rising power and influence of the Macedonian kingdom. In 340 BC a Persian force was dispatched to assist the Thracian prince Cersobleptes to maintain his independence. Sufficient effective aid was given to the city of Perinthus that the numerous and wellappointed army with which Philip had commenced his siege of the city was compelled to give up the attempt.117 By the last year of Artaxerxes rule Philip II already had plans in place for an invasion of the Persian Empire which would crown his career but the Greeks would not unite with him.124 In 338 BC Artaxerxes was poisoned by Bagoas with the assistance of a physician.125 Fall to Alexander III of Macedonedit The Battle of Issus between Alexander the Great on horseback to the left and Darius III in the chariot to the right represented in a Pompeii mosaic dated 
1 st century BC  Naples National Archaeological Museum Alexanders first victory over Darius the Persian king depicted in medieval European style in the 
15 th century romance The History of Alexanders Battles Artaxerxes III was succeeded by Artaxerxes IV Arses who before he could act was also poisoned by Bagoas. Bagoas is further said to have killed not only all Arses children but many of the other princes of the land. Bagoas then placed Darius III a nephew of Artaxerxes IV on the throne. Darius III previously the Satrap of Armenia personally forced Bagoas to swallow poison. In 334 BC when Darius was just succeeding in subduing Egypt again Alexander and his battlehardened troops invaded Asia Minor.citation needed Alexander the Great Alexander III of Macedon defeated the Persian armies at Granicus 334 BC followed by Issus 333 BC and lastly at Gaugamela 331 BC. Afterwards he marched on Susa and Persepolis which surrendered in early 330 BC. From Persepolis Alexander headed north to Pasargadae where he visited the tomb of Cyrus the man whom he had heard of from the Cyropaedia.citation needed In the ensuing chaos created by Alexanders invasion of Persia Cyruss tomb was broken into and most of its luxuries were looted. When Alexander reached the tomb he was horrified by the manner in which it had been treated and questioned the Magi putting them on trial.126127 By some accounts Alexanders decision to put the Magi on trial was more an attempt to undermine their influence and display his own power than a show of concern for Cyruss tomb.128 Regardless Alexander the Great ordered Aristobulus to improve the tombs condition and restore its interior showing respect for Cyrus.126 From there he headed to Ecbatana where Darius III had sought refuge.129 Darius III was taken prisoner by Bessus his Bactrian satrap and kinsman. As Alexander approached Bessus had his men murder Darius III and then declared himself Darius successor as Artaxerxes V before retreating into Central Asia leaving Darius body in the road to delay Alexander who brought it to Persepolis for an honourable funeral. Bessus would then create a coalition of his forces to create an army to defend against Alexander. Before Bessus could fully unite with his confederates at the eastern part of the empire130 Alexander fearing the danger of Bessus gaining control found him put him on trial in a Persian court under his control and ordered his execution in a cruel and barbarous manner.131 Alexander generally kept the original Achaemenid administrative structure leading some scholars to dub him as the last of the Achaemenids.132 Upon Alexanders death in 323 BC his empire was divided among his generals the Diadochi resulting in a number of smaller states. The largest of these which held sway over the Iranian plateau was the Seleucid Empire ruled by Alexanders general Seleucus I Nicator. Native Iranian rule would be restored by the Parthians of northeastern Iran over the course of the 
2 nd century BC through the Parthian Empire.133 Descendants in later Persian dynastiesedit Frataraka of the Seleucid Empire Frataraka dynasty ruler Vadfradad I Autophradates I. 
3 rd century BC. Istakhr Persepolis mint.134 Main article Frataraka Several later Persian rulers forming the Frataraka dynasty are known to have acted as representatives of the Seleucids in the region of Frs.135 They ruled from the end of the 
3 rd century BC to the beginning of the 
2 nd century BC and Vahbarz or Vdfradd I obtained independence c.150 BC when Seleucid power waned in the areas of southwestern Persia and the Persian Gulf region.135 Kings of Persis under the Parthian Empire Main article Kings of Persis Drv I Darios I used for the first time the title of mlk King. 
2 nd century BC. During an apparent transitional period corresponding to the reigns of Vdfradd II and another uncertain king no titles of authority appeared on the reverse of their coins. The earlier title prtrk zy alhaya Frataraka had disappeared. Under Drv I Darios I however the new title of mlk or king appeared sometimes with the mention of prs Persis suggesting that the kings of Persis had become independent rulers.136 When the Parthian Arsacid king Mithridates I c. 171138 BC took control of Persis he left the Persian dynasts in office known as the Kings of Persis and they were allowed to continue minting coins with the title of mlk King.135 Sasanian Empire Main article Sasanian Empire With the reign of buhr the son of Ppag the kingdom of Persis then became a part of the Sasanian Empire. buhrs brother and successor Ardaxir Artaxerxes V defeated the last legitimate Parthian king Artabanos V in 224 AD and was crowned at Ctesiphon as Ardaxir I Ardashir I hanh  rn becoming the first king of the new Sasanian Empire.136 Kingdom of Pontus The Achaemenid line would also be carried on through the Kingdom of Pontus based in the Pontus region of northern Asia Minor. This Pontic Kingdom a state of Persian origin137138139140 may even have been directly related to Darius I and the Achaemenid dynasty.140 It was founded by Mithridates I in 281 BC and lasted until its conquest by the Roman Republic in 63 BC. The kingdom grew to its largest extent under Mithridates VI the Great who conquered Colchis Cappadocia Bithynia the Greek colonies of the Tauric Chersonesos and for a brief time the Roman province of Asia. Thus this Persian dynasty managed to survive and prosper in the Hellenistic world while the main Persian Empire had fallen.citation needed Despite Greek influence on the Kingdom of Pontus Pontics continued to maintain their Achaemenid lineage.140 Winged sphinx from the Palace of Darius in Susa Louvre Both the later dynasties of the Parthians and Sasanians would on occasion claim Achaemenid descent. Recently there has been some corroboration for the Parthian claim to Achaemenid ancestry via the possibility of an inherited disease neurofibromatosis demonstrated by the physical descriptions of rulers and from the evidence of familial disease on ancient coinage.141 Governmentedit Satrapies of the Achaemenid Empire showing their ancient names and the extent of their territory. Cyrus the Great founded the empire as a multistate empire governed from four capital cities Pasargadae Babylon Susa and Ecbatana. The Achaemenids allowed a certain amount of regional autonomy in the form of the satrapy system. A satrapy was an administrative unit usually organized on a geographical basis. A satrap governor was the governor who administered the region a general supervised military recruitment and ensured order and a state secretary kept the official records. The general and the state secretary reported directly to the satrap as well as the central government. At differing times there were between 20 and 30 satrapies. Cyrus the Great created an organized army including the Immortals unit consisting of 10000 highly trained soldiers142 Cyrus also formed an innovative postal system throughout the empire based on several relay stations called Chapar Khaneh.143 Persepolis Administrative Archives provide many insights into the Achaemenid government system. Found at Persepolis in the 19
30 s they are mostly in ancient Elamite the remains of more than 10000 of these cuneiform documents have been uncovered. Aramaic is represented by about 1000 or more original records.144 Only one tablet in Old Persian has been identified so far.145 Also many seals and seal impressions are found in these Persepolis archives. These documents represent administrative activity and flow of data in Persepolis over more than fifty consecutive years 509 to 457 BC. Coinageedit Main article Achaemenid coinage Daric of Artaxerxes II The Persian daric was the first gold coin which along with a similar silver coin the siglos introduced the bimetallic monetary standard of the Achaemenids which has continued until today.146 This was accomplished by Darius I who reinforced the empire and expanded Persepolis as a ceremonial capital147 he revolutionized the economy by placing it on the silver and gold coinage. Tax districtsedit See also Districts of the Achaemenid Empire Volume of annual tribute per district in the Achaemenid Empire according to Herodotus.148149150 Darius also introduced a regulated and sustainable tax system that was precisely tailored to each satrapy based on their supposed productivity and their economic potential. For instance Babylon was assessed for the highest amount and for a startling mixture of commodities  1000 silver talents four months supply of food for the army. India was clearly already fabled for its gold Egypt was known for the wealth of its crops it was to be the granary of the Persian Empire as later of Romes and was required to provide 120000 measures of grain in addition to 700 talents of silver. This was exclusively a tax levied on subject peoples.151 There is evidence that conquered and rebellious enemies could be sold into slavery.152 Alongside its other innovations in administration and taxation the Achaemenids may have been the first government in the ancient Near East to register private slave sales and tax them using an early form of sales tax.153 Achaemenid tax collector calculating on an Abax or Abacus according to the Darius Vase 340320 BC.154 Other accomplishments of Darius reign included the codification of the dta a universal legal system which would become the basis of later Iranian law and the construction of a new capital at Persepolis.155156 Transportation and communicationedit Under the Achaemenids trade was extensive and there was an efficient infrastructure that facilitated the exchange of commodities in the far reaches of the empire. Tariffs on trade along with agriculture and tribute were major sources of revenue for the empire.151157 Letter from the Satrap of Bactria to the governor of Khulmi concerning camel keepers 353 BC Part of the royal road that connected Ekbatan to Anatolia this road is still in use today The satrapies were linked by a 25
00 kilometer highway the most impressive stretch being the Royal Road from Susa to Sardis built by command of Darius I. It featured stations and caravanserais at specific intervals. The relays of mounted couriers the angarium could reach the remotest of areas in fifteen days. Herodotus observes that there is nothing in the world that travels faster than these Persian couriers. Neither snow nor rain nor heat nor gloom of night stays these courageous couriers from the swift completion of their appointed rounds.158 Despite the relative local independence given by the satrapy system royal inspectors the eyes and ears of the king toured the empire and reported on local conditions.citation needed Another highway of commerce was the Great Khorasan Road an informal mercantile route that originated in the fertile lowlands of Mesopotamia and snaked through the Zagros highlands through the Iranian plateau and Afghanistan into the Central Asian regions of Samarkand Merv and Ferghana allowing for the construction of frontier cities like Cyropolis. Following Alexanders conquests this highway allowed for the spread of cultural syncretic fusions like GrecoBuddhism into Central Asia and China as well as empires like the Kushan IndoGreek and Parthian to profit from trade between East and West. This route was greatly rehabilitated and formalized during the Abbasid Caliphate during which it developed into a major component of the famed Silk Road.159 Militaryedit Despite its humble origins in Persis the empire reached an enormous size under the leadership of Cyrus the Great. Cyrus created a multistate empire where he allowed regional rulers satraps to rule as his proxy over a certain designated area of his empire called a satrapy. The basic rule of governance was based upon loyalty and obedience of each satrapy to the central power or the king and compliance with tax laws.160 Due to the ethnocultural diversity of the subject nations under the rule of Persia its enormous geographic size and the constant struggle for power by regional competitors20 the creation of a professional army was necessary for both maintenance of the peace and to enforce the authority of the king in cases of rebellion and foreign threat.21142 Cyrus managed to create a strong land army using it to advance in his campaigns in Babylonia Lydia and Asia Minor which after his death was used by his son Cambyses II in Egypt against Psamtik III. Cyrus would die battling a local Iranian insurgency in the empire before he could have a chance to develop a naval force.161 That task would fall to Darius I who would officially give Persians their own royal navy to allow them to engage their enemies on multiple seas of this vast empire from the Black Sea and the Aegean Sea to the Persian Gulf Ionian Sea and the Mediterranean Sea.citation needed Ethnic compositionedit Relief of thronebearing soldiers in their native clothing at the tomb of Xerxes I demonstrating the satrapies under his rule. The empires great armies were like the empire itself very diverse havingf Persians163 Macedonians86 European Thracians Paeonians Medes Achaean Greeks Cissians Hyrcanians164 Assyrians Chaldeans165 Bactrians Sacae166 Arians Parthians Caucasian Albanians167 Chorasmians Sogdians Gandarans Dadicae168 Caspians Sarangae Pactyes169 Utians Mycians Phoenicians Judeans Egyptians170 Cyprians171 Cilicians Pamphylians Lycians Dorians of Asia Carians Ionians Aegean islanders Aeolians Greeks from Pontus Paricanians172 Arabians Ethiopians of Africa173 Ethiopians of Baluchistan174 Libyans175 Paphlagonians Ligyes Matieni Mariandyni Cappadocians176 Phrygians Armenians177 Lydians Mysians178 Asian Thracians179 Lasonii Milyae180 Moschi Tibareni Macrones Mossynoeci181 Mares Colchians Alarodians Saspirians182 Red Sea islanders183 Sagartians184 Hindush185 Eordi Bottiaei Chalcidians Brygians Pierians Perrhaebi Enienes Dolopes and Magnesians.citation needed Infantryedit Achaemenid king killing a Greek hoplite. c.500 BC475 BC at the time of Xerxes I. Metropolitan Museum of Art. Persian soldiers left fighting against Scythians. Cylinder seal impression.186 The Achaemenid infantry consisted of three groups the Immortals the Sparabara and the Takabara though in the later years of the Achaemenid Empire a fourth group the Cardaces were introduced.citation needed The Immortals were described by Herodotus as being heavy infantry led by Hydarnes II that were kept constantly at a strength of exactly 10000 men. He claimed that the units name stemmed from the custom that every killed seriously wounded or sick member was immediately replaced with a new one maintaining the numbers and cohesion of the unit.187 They had wicker shields short spears swords or large daggers and bow and arrows. Underneath their robes they wore scale armour coats. The spear counterbalances of the common soldiery were of silver to differentiate commanding ranks the officers spear buttspikes were golden.187 Surviving Achaemenid colored glazed bricks and carved reliefs represent the Immortals as wearing elaborate robes hoop earrings and gold jewellery though these garments and accessories were most likely worn only for ceremonial occasions.188 Color reconstruction of Achaemenid infantry on the Alexander Sarcophagus end of 
4 th century BC. The Sparabara were usually the first to engage in handtohand combat with the enemy. Although not much is known about them today it is believed that they were the backbone of the Persian army who formed a shield wall and used their twometrelong spears to protect more vulnerable troops such as archers from the enemy. The Sparabara were taken from the full members of Persian society were trained from childhood to be soldiers and when not called out to fight on campaigns in distant lands they practised hunting on the vast plains of Persia. However when all was quiet and the Pax Persica held true the Sparabara returned to normal life farming the land and grazing their herds. Because of this they lacked true professional quality on the battlefield yet they were well trained and courageous to the point of holding the line in most situations long enough for a counterattack. They were armoured with quilted linen and carried large rectangular wicker shields as a form of light maneuverable defence. This however left them at a severe disadvantage against heavily armoured opponents such as the hoplite and their twometrelong spear was not able to give the Sparabara ample range to plausibly engage a trained phalanx. The wicker shields were able to effectively stop arrows but not strong enough to protect the soldier from spears. However the Sparabara could deal with most other infantry including trained units from the East.citation needed The Achaemenids relied heavily on archery. Major contributing nations were the Scythians Medes Persians and the Elamites. The composite bow was used by the Persians and Medes who adopted it from the Scythians and transmitted it to other nations including the Greeks.189 Achaemenid armies typically used socketed threebladed also known as trilobate or Scythian arrowheads. These arrowheads were cast from leaded tinbronze which made them amenable to massproduction unlike the wrought iron arrowheads of the period that had to be individually forged.190191192193194 The Takabara were a rare unit who were a tough type of peltasts.195 They tended to fight with their own native weapons which would have included a crescentshaped light wickerwork shield and axes as well as light linen cloth and leather. The Takabara were recruited from territories that incorporated modern Iran. Cavalryedit Seal of Darius the Great hunting in a chariot reading I am Darius the Great King in Old Persian   adam Drayavau xyaiya as well as in Elamite and Babylonian. The word great only appears in Babylonian. British Museum.196197 The armoured Persian horsemen and their death dealing chariots were invincible. No man dared face them Herodotus The Persian cavalry was crucial for conquering nations and maintained its importance in the Achaemenid army to the last days of the Achaemenid Empire. The cavalry was separated into four groups. The chariot archers horse cavalry the camel cavalry and the war elephants.citation needed Achaemenid cavalryman in the satrapy of Hellespontine Phrygia Altkula Sarcophagus early 
4 th century BC. In the later years of the Achaemenid Empire the chariot archer had become merely a ceremonial part of the Persian army yet in the early years of the Empire their use was widespread. The chariot archers were armed with lances bows arrows swords and scale armour. The horses were also suited with scale armour similar to scale armour of the Sassanian cataphracts. The chariots would contain imperial symbols and decorations. Armoured cavalry Achaemenid Dynast of Hellespontine Phrygia attacking a Greek psiloi Altkula Sarcophagus early 
4 th century BC. The horses used by the Achaemenids for cavalry were often suited with scale armour like most cavalry units. The riders often had the same armour as Infantry units wicker shields short spears swords or large daggers bow and arrow and scale armour coats. The camel cavalry was different because the camels and sometimes the riders were provided little protection against enemies yet when they were offered protection they would have lances swords bow arrow and scale armour. The camel cavalry was first introduced into the Persian army by Cyrus the Great at the Battle of Thymbra. The elephant was most likely introduced into the Persian army by Darius I after his conquest of the Indus Valley. Elephants may have been used in Greek campaigns by Darius and Xerxes I but Greek accounts only mention 15 of them being used at the Battle of Gaugamela.citation needed Navyedit Main article Achaemenid navy Since its foundation by Cyrus the Persian empire had been primarily a land empire with a strong army but void of any actual naval forces. By the 
5 th century BC this was to change as the empire came across Greek and Egyptian forces each with their own maritime traditions and capabilities. Darius I was the first Achaemenid king to invest in a Persian fleet.198 Even by then no true imperial navy had existed either in Greece or Egypt. Persia would become the first empire under Darius to inaugurate and deploy the first regular imperial navy.198 Despite this achievement the personnel for the imperial navy would not come from Iran but were often Phoenicians mostly from Sidon Egyptians and Greeks chosen by Darius the Great to operate the empires combat vessels.198 Reconstitution of Persian landing ships at the Battle of Marathon. At first the ships were built in Sidon by the Phoenicians the first Achaemenid ships measured about 40 meters in length and 6 meters in width able to transport up to 300 Persian troops at any one trip. Soon other states of the empire were constructing their own ships each incorporating slight local preferences. The ships eventually found their way to the Persian Gulf198 and Persian naval forces laid the foundation for a strong Persian maritime presence there. Persians also had ships often of a capacity 100 to 200 troops patrolling the empires various rivers including the Karun Tigris and Nile in the west as well as the Indus.198 Greek ships against Achaemenid ships at the Battle of Salamis. The Achaemenid navy established bases located along the Karun and in Bahrain Oman and Yemen. The Persian fleet was not only used for peacekeeping purposes along the Karun but also opened the door to trade with India via the Persian Gulf.198 Dariuss navy was in many ways a world power at the time but it would be Artaxerxes II who in the summer of 397 BC would build a formidable navy as part of a rearmament which would lead to his decisive victory at Knidos in 394 BC reestablishing Achaemenid power in Ionia. Artaxerxes II would also use his navy to later on quell a rebellion in Egypt.199 The construction material of choice was wood but some armoured Achaemenid ships had metallic blades on the front often meant to slice enemy ships using the ships momentum. Naval ships were also equipped with hooks on the side to grab enemy ships or to negotiate their position. The ships were propelled by sails or manpower. The ships the Persians created were unique. As far as maritime engagement the ships were equipped with two mangonels that would launch projectiles such as stones or flammable substances.198 Xenophon describes his eyewitness account of a massive military bridge created by joining 37 Persian ships across the Tigris. The Persians used each boats buoyancy to support a connected bridge above which supply could be transferred.198 Herodotus also gives many accounts of the Persians using ships to build bridges.200201 Darius I in an attempt to subdue the Scythian horsemen north of the Black Sea crossed over at the Bosphorus using an enormous bridge made by connecting Achaemenid boats then marched up to the Danube crossing it by means of a second boat bridge.202 The bridge over the Bosphorus essentially connected the nearest tip of Asia to Europe encompassing at least some 1000 meters of open water if not more. Herodotus describes the spectacle and calls it the bridge of Darius203 Strait called Bosphorus across which the bridge of Darius had been thrown is hundred and twenty furlongs in length reaching from the Euxine to the Propontis. The Propontis is five hundred furlongs across and fourteen hundred long. Its waters flow into the Hellespont the length of which is four hundred furlongs ... Years later a similar boat bridge would be constructed by Xerxes I in his invasion of Greece. Although the Persians failed to capture the Greek citystates completely the tradition of maritime involvement was carried down by the Persian kings most notably Artaxerxes II. Years later when Alexander invaded Persia and during his advancement into India he took a page from the Persian art of war by having Hephaestion and Perdiccas construct a similar boatbridge at the Indus river in India in the spring of 327 BC.204 Cultureedit Languagesedit Gold foundation tablets of Darius I for the Apadana Palace in their original stone box. The Apadana coin hoard had been deposited underneath c.510 BC. One of the two gold deposition plates. Two more were in silver. They all had the same trilingual inscription DPh inscription.205 During the reign of Cyrus II and Darius I and as long as the seat of government was still at Susa in Elam the language of the chancellery was Elamite. This is primarily attested in the Persepolis fortification and treasury tablets that reveal details of the daytoday functioning of the empire.206 In the grand rockface inscriptions of the kings the Elamite texts are always accompanied by Akkadian Babylonian dialect and Old Persian inscriptions and it appears that in these cases that the Elamite texts are translations of the Old Persian ones. It is then likely that although Elamite was used by the capital government in Susa it was not a standardized language of government everywhere in the empire. The use of Elamite is not attested after 458 BC.207 A section of the Old Persian part of the trilingual Behistun inscription. Other versions are in Babylonian and Elamite. The Behistun papyrus a copy of the Behistun inscription in Aramaic on a papyrus. Aramaic was the lingua franca of the empire. Following the conquest of Mesopotamia the Aramaic language as used in that territory was adopted as a vehicle for written communication between the different regions of the vast empire with its different peoples and languages. The use of a single official language which modern scholarship has dubbed Official Aramaic or Imperial Aramaic can be assumed to have greatly contributed to the astonishing success of the Achaemenids in holding their farflung empire together for as long as they did.208 In 1955 Richard Frye questioned the classification of Imperial Aramaic as an official language noting that no surviving edict expressly and unambiguously accorded that status to any particular language.209 Frye reclassifies Imperial Aramaic as the lingua franca of the Achaemenid empire suggesting that the use of Aramaic language in Achaemenid empire was more widespread than generally thought. Many centuries after the fall of the empire Aramaic script andas ideogramsAramaic vocabulary would survive as the essential characteristics of the Pahlavi writing system.210 Although Old Persian also appears on some seals and art objects that language is attested primarily in the Achaemenid inscriptions of Western Iran suggesting then that Old Persian was the common language of that region. However by the reign of Artaxerxes II the grammar and orthography of the inscriptions was so far from perfect211 that it has been suggested that the scribes who composed those texts had already largely forgotten the language and had to rely on older inscriptions which they to a great extent reproduced verbatim.212 When the occasion demanded Achaemenid administrative correspondence was conducted in Greek making it a widely used bureaucratic language.9 Even though the Achaemenids had extensive contacts with the Greeks and vice versa and had conquered many of the Greekspeaking areas both in Europe and Asia Minor during different periods of the empire the native Old Iranian sources provide no indication of Greek linguistic influence.9 However there is plenty of evidence in addition to the accounts of Herodotus that Greeks apart from being deployed and employed in the core regions of the empire also evidently lived and worked in the heartland of the Achaemenid Empire namely Iran.9 For example Greeks were part of the various ethnicities that constructed Darius palace in Susa apart from the Greek inscriptions found nearby there and one short Persepolis tablet written in Greek.9 Customsedit An Achaemenid rhyton or drinking vessel Herodotus mentions that the Persians were invited to great birthday feasts Herodotus Histories 8 which would be followed by many desserts a treat which they reproached the Greeks for omitting from their meals. He also observed that the Persians drank wine in large quantities and used it even for counsel deliberating on important affairs when drunk and deciding the next day when sober whether to act on the decision or set it aside.213 Religionedit Mithra214 was worshipped215216 his temples and symbols were the most widespread217 most people bore names related to him218 and most festivals were dedicated to him.219220 Religious toleration has been described as a remarkable feature of the Achaemenid Empire.221 The Old Testament reports that Persian king Cyrus the Great released the Jewish people from the Babylonian captivity in 539530 BC and permitted them to return to their homeland.222 Cyrus the Great assisted in the restoration of the sacred places of various cities.221 It was during the Achaemenid period that Zoroastrianism reached southwestern Iran where it came to be accepted by the rulers and through them became a defining element of Persian culture. The religion was not only accompanied by a formalization of the concepts and divinities of the traditional Iranian pantheon but also introduced several novel ideas including that of free will.223224 Basrelief of Farvahar at Persepolis During the reign of Artaxerxes I and Darius II the Greek historian Herodotus wrote the Persians have no images of the gods no temples nor altars and consider the use of them a sign of folly. This comes I think from their not believing the gods to have the same nature with men as the Greeks imagine.225 He claims the Persians offer sacrifice to the sun and moon to the earth to fire to water and to the winds. These are the only gods whose worship has come down to them from ancient times. At a later period they began the worship of Urania which they borrowed from the Arabians and Assyrians. Mylitta is the name by which the Assyrians know this goddess to whom the Persians referred as Anahita.225 The Babylonian scholar and priest Berosus recordsalthough writing over seventy years after the reign of Artaxerxes II  that the emperor had been the first to make cult statues of divinities and have them placed in temples in many of the major cities of the empire.226 Berosus also substantiates Herodotus when he says the Persians knew of no images of gods until Artaxerxes II erected those images. On the means of sacrifice Herodotus adds they raise no altar light no fire pour no libations.227 Herodotus also observed that no prayer or offering can be made without a magus present.227 Womenedit The position of women in the Achaemenid Empire differed depending on which culture they belonged to and therefore varied depending on the region. The position of Persian women in actual Persia has traditionally been described from mythological Biblical references and the sometimes biased Ancient Greek sources neither of them fully reliable as sources but the most reliable references are the archeological Persepolis Fortification Tablets PFT which describes women in connection to the royal court in Persepolis from royal women to female laborers who were recipients of food rations at Persepolis.228 The hierarchy of the royal women at the Persian court was ranked with the kings mother first followed by the queen and the kings daughters the kings concubines and the other women of the royal palace.228 The king normally married a female member of the royal family or a Persian noblewoman related to a satrap or another important Persian man it was permitted for members of the royal family to marry relatives but there is no evidence for marriage between closer family members than halfsiblings.228 The kings concubines were often either slaves sometimes prisoners of war or foreign princesses whom the king did not marry because they were foreigners and whose children did not have the right to inherit the throne.228 Greek sources accuse the king of having hundreds of concubines secluded in a harem but there is no archeological evidence supporting the existence of a harem or the seclusion of women from contact with men at the Persian court.228 The royal women joined the king at breakfast and dinner and accompanied him on his journeys.228 They may have participated in the royal hunt as well as during the royal banquets Herodotus relates how the Persian envoys at the Macedonian court demanded the presence of women during a banquet because it was the custom for women to participate in the banquets in their own country.228 The queen may have attended the kings audience and archeological evidence shows that she gave her own audiences at least for female supplicants.228 Royal women and noblewomen at court could furthermore travel on their own accompanied by both male and female staff own and manage their own fortune land and business.228 Depictions of Persian women show them with long dresses and veils which did not cover their faces nor their hair only flowing down over their neck at the back of the head as an ornament.228 Royal and aristocratic Achaemenid women were given an education in subjects that did not appear compatible with seclusions such as horsemanship and archery.229230 Royal and aristocratic women held and managed vast estates and workshops and employed large numbers of servants and professional laborers.231 Royal and aristocratic women do not seem to have lived in seclusion from men since it is known that they appeared in public232 and traveled with their husbands232 participated in hunting233 and in feasts234 at least the chief wife of a royal or aristocratic man did not live in seclusion as it is clearly stated that wives customarily accompanied their husbands at dinner banquets although they left the banquet when the women entertainers came in and the men began merrymaking.235 No woman ever ruled the Achaemenid Empire as monarch or as regent but some queens consorts are known to have had influence over the affairs of state notably Atossa and Parysatis. There are no evidence of any women being employed as an official in the administration or within religious service however there are plenty of archeological evidence of women being employed as free labourers in Persepolis where they worked alongside men.228 Women could be employed as the leaders of their workforce known by the title arraara paabena which were then given a higher salary than the male workers of their workforce228 and while female laborers were given less than men qualified workers within the crafts were given equal pay regardless of their sex.228 Architecture and artedit Main article Achaemenid architecture The ruins of Persepolis Achaemenid architecture included large cities temples palaces and mausoleums such as the tomb of Cyrus the Great. The quintessential feature of Persian architecture was its eclectic nature with elements of Median Assyrian and Asiatic Greek all incorporated yet maintaining a unique Persian identity seen in the finished products.236 Its influence pervades the regions ruled by the Achaemenids from the Mediterranean shores to India especially with its emphasis on monumental stonecut design and gardens subdivided by watercourses.237 Achaemenid art includes frieze reliefs metalwork such as the Oxus Treasure decoration of palaces glazed brick masonry fine craftsmanship masonry carpentry etc. and gardening. Although the Persians took artists with their styles and techniques from all corners of their empire they did not just produce a combination of styles but a synthesis of a new unique Persian style.238 One of the most remarkable examples of both Achaemenid architecture and art is the grand palace of Persepolis and its detailed workmanship coupled with its grand scale. In describing the construction of his palace at Susa Darius I records that Yaka timber was brought from Gandara and from Carmania. The gold was brought from Sardis and from Bactria ... the precious stone lapislazuli and carnelian ... was brought from Sogdiana. The turquoise from Chorasmia the silver and ebony from Egypt the ornamentation from Ionia the ivory from Ethiopia and from Sindh and from Arachosia. The stonecutters who wrought the stone were Ionians and Sardians. The goldsmiths were Medes and Egyptians. The men who wrought the wood were Sardinians and Egyptians. The men who wrought the baked brick were Babylonians. The men who adorned the wall those were Medes and Egyptians.citation needed Reconstruction of the Palace of Darius at Susa. The palace served as a model for Persepolis. Lion on a decorative panel from Darius I the Greats palace Louvre Iconic relief of lion and bull fighting Apadana of Persepolis Achaemenid golden bowl with lioness imagery of Mazandaran National Museum of Iran Tombsedit Tomb of Artaxerxes III in Persepolis Many Achaemenid rulers built tombs for themselves. The most famous Naqshe Rustam is an ancient necropolis located about 12 km northwest of Persepolis with the tombs of four of the kings of the dynasty are carved in this mountain Darius I Xerxes I Artaxerxes I and Darius II. Other kings constructed their own tombs elsewhere. Artaxerxes II and Artaxerxes III preferred to carve their tombs beside their spring capital Persepolis the left tomb belonging to Artaxerxes II and the right tomb belonging to Artaxerxes III the last Achaemenid king to have a tomb. The tomb of the founder of the Achaemenid dynasty Cyrus the Great was built in Pasargadae now a world heritage site.citation needed Legacyedit The Mausoleum at Halicarnassus one of the Seven wonders of the ancient world was built by Greek architects for the local Persian satrap of Caria Mausolus Scale model The Achaemenid Empire left a lasting impression on the heritage and cultural identity of Asia and the Middle East and influenced the development and structure of future empires. In fact the Greeks and later on the Romans adopted the best features of the Persian method of governing an empire.239 The Persian model of governance was particularly formative in the expansion and maintenance of the Abbasid Caliphate whose rule is widely considered the period of the Islamic Golden Age. Like the ancient Persians the Abbasid dynasty centered their vast empire in Mesopotamia at the newly founded cities of Baghdad and Samarra close to the historical site of Babylon derived much of their support from Persian aristocracy and heavily incorporated the Persian language and architecture into Islamic culture.240 The Achaemenid Empire is noted in Western history as the antagonist of the Greek citystates during the GrecoPersian Wars and for the emancipation of the Jewish exiles in Babylon. The historical mark of the empire went far beyond its territorial and military influences and included cultural social technological and religious influences as well. For example many Athenians adopted Achaemenid customs in their daily lives in a reciprocal cultural exchange241 some being employed by or allied to the Persian kings. The impact of the Edict of Cyrus is mentioned in JudeoChristian texts and the empire was instrumental in the spread of Zoroastrianism as far east as China. The empire also set the tone for the politics heritage and history of Iran also known as Persia.242 Historian Arnold Toynbee regarded Abbasid society as a reintegration or reincarnation of Achaemenid society as the synthesis of Persian Turkic and Islamic modes of governance and knowledge allowed for the spread of Persianate culture over a wide swath of Eurasia through the Turkicorigin Seljuq Ottoman Safavid and Mughal empires.240 Historian Bernard Lewis wrote that The work of Iranians can be seen in every field of cultural endeavor including Arabic poetry to which poets of Iranian origin composing their poems in Arabic made a very significant contribution. In a sense Iranian Islam is a second advent of Islam itself a new Islam sometimes referred to as IslamiAjam. It was this Persian Islam rather than the original Arab Islam that was brought to new areas and new peoples to the Turks first in Central Asia and then in the Middle East in the country which came to be called Turkey and of course to India. The Ottoman Turks brought a form of Iranian civilization to the walls of Vienna. ... By the time of the great Mongol invasions of the thirteenth century Iranian Islam had become not only an important component it had become a dominant element in Islam itself and for several centuries the main centers of the Islamic power and civilization were in countries that were if not Iranian at least marked by Iranian civilization ... The major centers of Islam in the late medieval and early modern periods the centers of both political and cultural power such as India Central Asia Iran Turkey were all part of this Iranian civilization. Georg W. F. Hegel in his work The Philosophy of History introduces the Persian Empire as the first empire that passed away and its people as the first historical people in history. According to his account The Persian Empire is an empire in the modern senselike that which existed in Germany and the great imperial realm under the sway of Napoleon for we find it consisting of a number of states which are indeed dependent but which have retained their own individuality their manners and laws. The general enactments binding upon all did not infringe upon their political and social idiosyncrasies but even protected and maintained them so that each of the nations that constitute the whole had its own form of constitution. As light illuminates everythingimparting to each object a peculiar vitalityso the Persian Empire extends over a multitude of nations and leaves to each one its particular character. Some have even kings of their own each one its distinct language arms way of life and customs. All this diversity coexists harmoniously under the impartial dominion of Light ... a combination of peoplesleaving each of them free. Thereby a stop is put to that barbarism and ferocity with which the nations had been wont to carry on their destructive feuds.243 Will Durant the American historian and philosopher during one of his speeches Persia in the History of Civilization as an address before the IranAmerica Society in Tehran on 21 April 1948 stated For thousands of years Persians have been creating beauty. Sixteen centuries before Christ there went from these regions or near it ... You have been here a kind of watershed of civilization pouring your blood and thought and art and religion eastward and westward into the world ... I need not rehearse for you again the achievements of your Achaemenid period. Then for the first time in known history an empire almost as extensive as the United States received an orderly government a competence of administration a web of swift communications a security of movement by men and goods on majestic roads equalled before our time only by the zenith of Imperial Rome.244 Rulersedit Part of a series on the History of Iran Prehistoric period BCE  BC Baradostian culture c. 3600018000 Zarzian culture c. 2000010000 ShulaveriShomu culture c. 60005000 Zayandeh River Culture c. 
6 th millennium Dalma culture c. 
5 th millennium Ancient period KuraAraxes culture 34002000 ProtoElamite 32002700 Jiroft culture c. 31002200 Lullubi KingdomZamua c. 3100675 Elam 2700539 Marhai c. 25502020 Oxus Civilization c. 24001700 Akkadian Empire 24002150 Kassites c. 15001155 Avestan period c. 1500500 NeoAssyrian Empire 911609 Urartu 860590 Mannaea 850616 Zikirti 750521 Saparda 720670 Imperial period Median Empire 678550 BC Scythian Kingdom 652625 BC Anshanite Kingdom 635 BC550 BC NeoBabylonian Empire 626 BC539 BC Sogdia c.
6 th century BC
11 th century AD Achaemenid Empire 550 BC330 BC Kingdom of Armenia 331 BC428 AD Atropatene c.323 BC226 AD Kingdom of Cappadocia 3
20 s BC17 AD Seleucid Empire 312 BC63 BC Kingdom of Pontus 281 BC62 BC Fratarakas 
3 rdcentury BC132 BC Parthian Empire 247 BC224 AD Elymais 147 BC224 AD Characene 141 BC222 AD Kings of Persis 132 BC224 AD IndoParthian Kingdom 19 AD2245 Paratarajas 125300 Sasanian Empire 224651 Zarmihrids 
6 th century785 Qarinvandids 5
50 s
11 th century Medieval period CE  AD Rashidun Caliphate 632661 Umayyad Caliphate 661750 Abbasid Caliphate 7501258 Dabuyids 642760 Bavandids 6511349 Masmughans of Damavand 651760 Baduspanids 6651598 Justanids 791  
11 th century Alid dynasties 864  
14 th century Tahirid dynasty 821873 Samanid Empire 819999 Saffarid dynasty 8611003 Ghurid dynasty pre879  1215 Sajid dynasty 889929 Sallarid dynasty 9191062 Ziyarid dynasty 9301090 Ilyasids 932968 Buyid dynasty 9341062 Rawadid dynasty 9551070 Hasanwayhids 9591095 Ghaznavid dynasty 9771186 Annazids 99011117 Kakuyids 10081141 Nasrid dynasty 10291236 Shabankara 10301355 Seljuk Empire 10371194 Khwarazmian dynasty 10771231 Eldiguzids 11351225 Atabegs of Yazd 11411319 Salghurids 11481282 Hazaraspids 11551424 Pishkinid dynasty 11551231 Khorshidi dynasty 11841597 QutlughKhanids 12231306 Mihrabanids 12361537 Kurt dynasty 12441396 Ilkhanate Empire 12561335 Chobanid dynasty 13351357 Muzaffarid dynasty 13351393 Jalayirid Sultanate 13371376 Sarbadars 13371376 Injuids 13351357 Afrasiyab dynasty 13491504 Marashis 13591596 Timurid Empire 13701507 KarKiya dynasty 13
70 s1592 Qara Qoyunlu 14061468 Aq Qoyunlu 14681508 Early modern period Safavid Iran 15011736 Hotak dynasty 17221729 Afsharid Iran 17361796 Zand dynasty 17511794 Modern period Qajar Iran 17891925 Pahlavi Iran 19251979 Contemporary period Iranian Revolution 1979 Interim Government 1979 Islamic Republic 19
79 present Related articles Name Monarchs Heads of state Economic history LGBT history Military history Womens history Wars Timeline Iran portal v t e Name Image Comments Dates Achaemenes First ruler of the Achaemenid kingdom and founder of the dynasty. Attested to only by the Behistun Inscription. 705 BC Teispes Son of Achaemenes. Attested to only by the Behistun Inscription. 640 BC Cyrus I Son of Teispes first Achaemenid ruler with attestation. 580 BC Cambyses I Son of Cyrus I and father of Cyrus II. No records from his reign survive. 550 BC Cyrus II Transformed the dynasty into an empire King of the four corners of the world 560530 BC Cambyses II King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt 530522 BC Gaumata King of Persia allegedly an impostor named Gaumata. 522 BC Darius I King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt. Cousin of Cambyses II and Bardiya. 522486 BC Xerxes I King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt 486465 BC Artaxerxes I King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt 465424 BC Xerxes II King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt. Assassinated by his halfbrother and successor Sogdianus. 424 BC 45 days Sogdianus King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt 424423 BC Darius II King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt. His birth name was Ochus. 423405 BC Artaxerxes II King of Persia. Ruling for 47 years Artaxerxes II was the longest reigning Achaemenid king. His birth name was Arses. 405358 BC Artaxerxes III King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt having reconquered the land after it was lost during the reign of Artaxerxes II. His birth name was Ochus. 358338 BC Artaxerxes IV King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt. His birth name was Arses. 338336 BC Darius III King of Persia in addition to Pharaoh of Egypt last ruler of the empire. His birth name was either Artashata or Codomannus. 336330 BC Galleryedit Ruins of Throne Hall Persepolis Apadana Hall Persian and Median soldiers at Persepolis Lateral view of tomb of Cambyses II Pasargadae Iran Plaque with horned liongriffins. The Metropolitan Museum of Art See alsoedit List of rulers of the preAchaemenid kingdoms of Iran List of Zoroastrian states and dynasties Explanatory notesedit  The standard was described as a golden eagle mounted upon a lofty shaft. This image is a reconstruction the design based on an Achaemenid tile from Persepolis and the coloring based on the Alexander Mosaic which depicts the standard in dark red and gold.1  Either King Xyaiya or King of Kings Xyaiya xyaiynm  The chronology of the reign of Cyrus is uncertain and these events are alternatively dated in 542541 BC.38  a b Bardiya is referred to by a variety of names in Greek sources including Smerdis Tanyoxarces Tanoxares Mergis and Mardos. The earliest account to mention him is the Behistun Inscription which has his name as Bardiya.6061  Sources differ on the circumstances of Cambyses death. According to Darius the Great in the Behistun Inscription he died of natural causes.60 According to Herodotus he died after accidentally wounding himself in the thigh.81 The true cause of death remains uncertain.63  All peoples listed except for the Caucasian Albanians are the ones that took part in the Second Persian invasion of Greece.162 The total amount of ethnicities could very well amount to much more.citation needed Referencesedit  DERAF. Encyclopdia Iranica. Encyclopdia Iranica Foundation. 21 November 2011. Retrieved 7 April 2019.  2002 Oxford Atlas of World History p.42 West portion of the Achaemenid Empire Archived 29 November 2022 at the Wayback Machine and p.43 East portion of the Achaemenid Empire.  OBrien Patrick Karl 2002. Atlas of World History. Oxford University Press. pp. 4243. ISBN 9780195219210.  Visible online Philips Atlas of World History 1999 Archived 17 October 2018 at the Wayback Machine  The Times Atlas of World History p.79 1989 Barraclough Geoffrey 1997. The Times Atlas of World History. Times Books. ISBN 9780723009061.  Yarshater Ehsan 1993. The Cambridge History of Iran Volume 3. Cambridge University Press. p. 482. ISBN 9780521200929. Of the four residences of the Achaemenids named by HerodotusEcbatana Pasargadae or Persepolis Susa and Babylonthe last situated in Iraq was maintained as their most important capital the fixed winter quarters the central office of bureaucracy exchanged only in the heat of summer for some cool spot in the highlands. Under the Seleucids and the Parthians the site of the Mesopotamian capital moved slightly to the north on the Tigristo Seleucia and Ctesiphon. It is indeed symbolic that these new foundations were built from the bricks of ancient Babylon just as later Baghdad a little further upstream was built out of the ruins of the Sassanian double city of SeleuciaCtesiphon.  Kittel Harald Frank Armin Paul House Juliane Greiner Norbert Schultze Brigitte Koller Werner 2007. Traduction encyclopdie internationale de la recherche sur la traduction. Walter de Gruyter. pp. 119495. ISBN 9783110171457.  Windfuhr Gernot. Iran vii. NonIranian Languages 3 Elamite. Encyclopdia Iranica. Retrieved 8 February 2017.  a b c d e Tucker Elizabeth 2001. Greek and Iranian. In Christidis AnastasiosPhoivos ed.. A History of Ancient Greek From the Beginnings to Late Antiquity. Cambridge Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9780521833073.  History of Iran Achaemenid Society and Culture. www.iranchamber.com. Retrieved 19 November 2022.  Boiy T. 2004. Late Achaemenid and Hellenistic Babylon. Leuven Peeters Publishers. p. 101. ISBN 9789042914490.  a b Turchin Peter Adams Jonathan M. Hall Thomas D December 2006. EastWest Orientation of Historical Empires. Journal of WorldSystems Research. 12 2 223. ISSN 10761
56 X. Retrieved 12 September 2016.  a b Taagepera Rein 1979. Size and Duration of Empires GrowthDecline Curves 600 B.C. to 600 A.D. Social Science History. 3 34 121. doi
10.2 3071170959. JSTOR 1170959.  Morris Ian Scheidel Walter 2009. The Dynamics of Ancient Empires State Power from Assyria to Byzantium. Oxford University Press. p. 77. ISBN 9780199758340.  Wiesehfer 2001 p. 119.  Lavan Payne  Weisweiler 2016 p. 17.  Brosius 2021 p. 1.  Shahbazi A. Shapour 2012. The Achaemenid Persian Empire 550330 bce. In Daryaee Touraj ed.. The Oxford handbook of Iranian history. Oxford Oxford University Press. p. 131. ISBN 9780199732159. Although the Persians and Medes shared domination and others were placed in important positions the Achaemenids did not  could not  provide a name for their multinational state. Nevertheless they referred to it as Khshassa the Empire.  a b Kent Roland G. 1954. Old Persian grammar texts lexicon. American Oriental Society. p. 181. ISBN 9780940490338.  a b c d Sacks David Murray Oswyn Brody Lisa 2005. Encyclopedia of the Ancient Greek World. Infobase Publishing. p. 256. ISBN 9780816057221.  a b Schmitt Rdiger 21 July 2011. Achaemenid Dynasty. Encyclopdia Iranica. Archived from the original on 29 April 2011. Retrieved 4 March 2019.  Ulrich Wilcken 1967. Alexander the Great. W.W. Norton  Company. p. 146. ISBN 9780393003819.  Taagepera Rein 1979. Size and Duration of Empires GrowthDecline Curves 600 B.C. to 600 A.D. Social Science History. 3 34 123. doi
10.2 3071170959. JSTOR 1170959. A superimposition of the maps of Achaemenid and Alexanders empires shows a 90 match except that Alexanders realm never reached the peak size of the Achaemenid realm.  Curtis Vesta Sarkhosh Stewart Sarah 2010. The Sasanian Era. I.B.Tauris. ISBN 9780857733092.  Tavernier 2007 p. 17.  a b Jamie Stokes 2009. Encyclopedia of the Peoples of Africa and the Middle East Volume II. Infobase Publishing. p. 551. ISBN 9780816071586.  Shapour Shahbazi Alireza 2012. Daryaee Touraj ed.. The Oxford handbook of Iranian history. Oxford Oxford University Press. p. 131. doi
10.1 0
93 oxfordhb97801997321
59.0 
01.0 001. ISBN 9780199732159. Although the Persians and Medes shared domination and others were placed in important positions the Achaemenids did notcould notprovide a name for their multinational state. Nevertheless they referred to it as Khshassa the Empire.  Brosius 2006 p. 3.  Van de Mieroop Marc 25 June 2015. A history of the ancient Near East ca. 3000323 BC Third ed.. Chichester West Sussex UK. ISBN 9781118718179. OCLC 904507201.cite book CS1 maint location missing publisher link  a b Briant 2002 p. 17.  Brosius 2006 p. 6.  Briant 2002 p. 16.  Briant 2002 p. 15.  Nabonidus Cylinder I.
8 II.25 Archived 12 May 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Nabonidus Chronicle II.14 Archived 11 May 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Briant 2002 p. 31.  Briant 2002 p. 33.  a b Briant 2002 p. 34.  Herodotus Histories I.72 I.73 Archived 25 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Briant 2002 p. 35.  Briant 2002 p. 36.  a b Brosius 2006 p. 11.  Briant 2002 p. 37.  Herodotus Histories I.154  Briant 2002 pp. 3738.  Justin Epitome I.7 Archived 17 May 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Briant 2002 p. 39.  Briant 2002 p. 40.  a b Briant 2002 pp. 4143.  Nabonidus Chronicle III.1216 Archived 11 May 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Brosius 2006 pp. 1112.  Cyrus Cylinder 2335 Archived 19 January 2019 at the Wayback Machine  Kuhrt 1983 pp. 8586.  a b Briant 2002 pp. 4344.  Cyrus Cylinder 43 Archived 19 January 2019 at the Wayback Machine  Kuhrt 1983 pp. 8889.  a b Briant 2002 p. 46.  Isaiah 4124 4513  Ezra 625  a b c Behistun Inscription 11 Archived 11 May 2021 at the Wayback Machine  a b Briant 2002 p. 98.  Briant 2002 pp. 4950.  a b Brosius 2006 p. 13.  Wallinga 1984 pp. 406409.  a b c d e f g Briant 2002 pp. 5255.  a b Herodotus Histories III.11 Archived 27 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine III.13 Archived 10 March 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.29 Archived 25 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.30 Archived 1 March 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.31 Archived 4 March 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.36 Archived 26 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.38 Archived 24 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Briant 2002 pp. 5557.  Herodotus Histories III.17 Archived 28 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.19 Archived 24 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Histories III.25 Archived 4 March 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Heidorn 1992 pp. 147150.  Herodotus Histories III.61 Archived 24 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Ctesias Persica 11 Archived 2 April 2017 at the Wayback Machine  Ctesias Persica 15 Archived 2 April 2017 at the Wayback Machine  Briant 2002 p. 61.  Herodotus Histories III.64 Archived 27 February 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Briant 2002 pp. 100101.  Briant 2002 pp. 101103.  Herodotus 1897. Herodotus the text of Canon Rawlinsons translation with the notes abridged Volume 1. C. Scribners. p. 278.  Herodotus. The Histories Book 
3.8 083.  a b c d e f g Joseph Roisman Ian Worthington A Companion to Ancient Macedonia. pp. 34245. John Wiley  Sons 2011 ISBN 9781444351637  The Oxford Classical Dictionary by Simon Hornblower and Antony Spawforth ISBN 9780198606413 p. 1515 The Thracians were subdued by the Persians by 516  Persian influence on Greece 2. Archived from the original on 24 July 2020. Retrieved 17 December 2014.  Howe  Reames 2008 p. 239.  Johannes Engels Ch. 5 Macedonians and Greeks In Roisman and Worthington A companion to Ancient Macedonia p. 87. Oxford Press 2010.  Maka. livius.org.  Behistun Inscription  DESTN. Retrieved 29 December 2014.  Suny Ronald Grigor 1994. The Making of the Georgian Nation. Indiana University Press. ISBN 9780253209153. Retrieved 29 December 2014.  RamirezFaria Carlos 2007. Concise Encyclopedia of World History. Atlantic Publishers  Dist. p. 6. ISBN 9788126907755. Retrieved 7 October 2012.  Kuhrt 2013 p. 2.  OBrien Patrick 2002. Concise Atlas of World History. Oxford University Press. p. 43. ISBN 9780195219210. Retrieved 7 October 2012. Curtis John E. Tallis Nigel 2005. Forgotten Empire The World of Ancient Persia. University of California Press. p. 47. ISBN 9780520247314. Facts on File Incorporated 2009. Encyclopedia of the Peoples of Africa and the Middle East. Infobase Publishing. p. 60. ISBN 9781438126760. Retrieved 7 October 2012. Parker Grant 2008. The Making of Roman India. Cambridge University Press. p. 13. ISBN 9780521858342. Retrieved 7 October 2012. Thapar Romila 2004. Early India From the Origins to AD 1300. University of California Press. p. 157. ISBN 9780520242258. Retrieved 7 October 2012.  Willis Mason West 1904. The ancient world from the earliest times to 800 CE. Allyn and Bacon. p. 137. The Athenian support was particularly troubling to Darius since he had come to their aid during their conflict with Sparta  a b Joseph Roisman Ian Worthington. A companion to Ancient Macedonia John Wiley  Sons 2011. ISBN 9781444351637 pp 13538 34345  Darius I  Biography Accomplishments  Facts. Encyclopedia Britannica. Retrieved 29 May 2020.  a b Hanson Victor Davis 18 December 2007. Carnage and Culture Landmark Battles in the Rise to Western Power. Knopf Doubleday Publishing Group. ISBN 9780307425188.  IraneBastanPirnia book 1 p. 873  See discussion on possible dates for the battle in the article Battle of the Eurymedon.  Homs George. Artaxerxes I Makrokheir Artaxerxes I Makrokheir  475 424  Stamboom Homs  Genealogy Online. Genealogy Online. Retrieved 24 May 2020.  Artaxerxes I of Persia. 2010. ISBN 9786130826345.  Plutarchs Lives by Plutarch Themistocles Themistocles Part II. 1 October 2015. Archived from the original on 1 October 2015. Retrieved 22 March 2018.  Kuhrt 2013 p. 880.  Kitto J 1841. Palestine the Bible History of the holy land. London. p. 657.  Maurice Whittemore Mather ed. Joseph William Hewitt ed. Xenophon Anabasis Books 14. University of Oklahoma Press 1979 ISBN 9780806113470 p. 44  Polybius 27 October 2012  Dandamaev  Lukonin 198936162  The Achaemenid Empire. 25 April 2014. Retrieved 21 June 20
15.1  Archived 19 June 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Kjeilen Tore. Artaxerxes 3. Archived from the original on 25 February 2008. Retrieved 5 March 2008.  Sekunda Nick Nicholas V. Sekunda Simon Chew 1992. The Persian Army 560330 BC. Osprey Publishing. p. 28. ISBN 9781855322509.  Miller James Maxwell Hayes John Haralson 1986. A History of Ancient Israel and Judah. Philadelphia The Westminster Press. p. 465. ISBN 9780664212629.  Newton Sir Charles Thomas R.P. Pullan 1862. A History of Discoveries at Halicarnassus Cnidus  Branchid. Day  son. p. 57.  a b c d e f Artaxerxes III Ochus  358 BC to 338 BC . Retrieved 2 March 2008.  Rawlinson George 1889. Phnicia under the Persians. History of Phoenicia. Longmans Green. Archived from the original on 20 July 2006. Retrieved 10 March 2008.  Chisholm Hugh ed. 1911. Artaxerxes . Encyclopdia Britannica. Vol. 2 
11 th ed.. Cambridge University Press. p. 663.  The Legend of Gog And Magog. Archived from the original on 15 March 2008. Retrieved 10 March 2008.  Bruce Frederick Fyvie 1990. The Acts of the Apostles The Greek Text with Introduction and Commentary. Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing. p. 117. ISBN 9780802809667.  Persian Period II. Archived from the original on 17 February 2008. Retrieved 6 March 2008.  Chapter V Temporary Relief. Archived from the original on 19 June 2008. Retrieved 1 March 2008.  Philip of Macedon Philip II of Macedon Biography. Archived from the original on 14 March 2008. Retrieved 7 March 2008.  Briant 2002 p. 769.  a b Charles Dexter Cleveland 1861. A compendium of classical literature comprising choice extracts translated from Greek and Roman writers with biographical sketches. Biddle. p. 313.  Abraham Valentine Williams Jackson 1906. Persia past and present. The Macmillan Company. p. 278.  Ralph Griffiths George Edward Griffiths George Edward Griffiths 1816. The Monthly review. 1816. p. 509.  Achaemenid Empire Cyrus the Great Darius the Great Xerxes the Great  Crystalinks. www.crystalinks.com. Retrieved 24 May 2020.  Theodore Ayrault Dodge 1890. Alexander a history of the origin and growth of the art of war from the earliest times to the battle of Ipsus B.C. 301 with a detailed account of the campaigns of the great Macedonian. Houghton Mifflin  Co. p. 438.  William Smith 1887. A smaller history of Greece from the earliest times to the Roman conquest. Harper  Brothers. p. 196.  Pierre Briant Amlie Kuhrt Amlie Kuhrt 2010. Alexander the Great and His Empire A Short Introduction. Princeton University Press. pp. 18385. ISBN 9780691141947.  Resources  Iran History. toosfoundation.com. Retrieved 24 May 2020.  CNG Feature Auction CNG 96. KINGS of PERSIS. Vdfradd Autophradates I. 
3 rd century BC. AR Tetradrachm 
28 mm 
15.8 9 g 
9 h. Istakhr Persepolis mint. www.cngcoins.com.  a b c FRATARAKA  Encyclopaedia Iranica. www.iranicaonline.org.  a b CNG Feature Auction CNG 90. KINGS of PERSIS. Vahbarz Oborzos. 
3 rd century BC. AR Obol 
10 mm 
0.5 0 g 
11 h. www.cngcoins.com.  The Foreign Policy of Mithridates VI Eupator King of Pontus by B.C. McGing p. 11  Children of Achilles The Greeks in Asia Minor Since the Days of Troy by John Freely pp. 6970  Strabo of Amasia A Greek Man of Letters in Augustan Rome by Daniela Dueck p. 3  a b c Pontus  Encyclopaedia Iranica. www.iranicaonline.org.  Ashrafian Hutan 2011. Limb gigantism neurofibromatosis and royal heredity in the Ancient World 2500 years ago Achaemenids and Parthians. J Plast Reconstr Aesthet Surg. 64 4 557. doi
10.1 0
16 j.bjps.20
10.0 
8.0 25. PMID 20832372.  a b Briant 2002 p. 261.  Herodotus Herodotus trans. A.D. Godley vol. 4 book 8 verse 98 pp. 9697 1924.  Persepolis Fortification Archive. Archived 29 September 2016 at the Wayback Machine Oriental Institute  The University of Chicago  Stolper Matthew W. and Tavernier Jan 2007 From the Persepolis Fortification Archive Project 1 An Old Persian Administrative Tablet from the Persepolis Fortification. Archived 20 September 2022 at the Wayback Machine ARTA 20
07.0 01  Michael Alram DARIC Archived 29 April 2011 at the Wayback Machine Encyclopaedia Iranica 15 December 1994 last updated 17 November 2011  Persepolis Recreated NEJ International Pictures 
1 st edition 2005 ISBN 9789640645253 ASIN B0
00 J
5 N
46 S httpswww.youtube.comwatchvnCwxJsk
14 e4 Archived 12 May 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus Book III 8995 Archived 29 November 2022 at the Wayback Machine  Archibald Zosia Davies John K. Gabrielsen Vincent 2011. The Economies of Hellenistic Societies Third to First Centuries BC. Oxford University Press. p. 404. ISBN 9780199587926.  India Relations Achaemenid Period  Encyclopaedia Iranica. www.iranicaonline.org.  a b History of Iran Persia. Historyworld.net. Retrieved 7 January 2011.  M. Dandamayev Foreign Slaves on the Estates of the Achaemenid Kings and their Nobles in Trudy dvadtsat pyatogo mezhdunarodnogo kongressa vostokovedov II Moscow 1963 pp. 15152  Stolper Matthew 1989. Registration and Taxation of Slave Sales in Achaemenid Babylonia. Zeitschrift fr Assyriologie und Vorderasiatische Archologie. 79 80101. doi
10.1 5
15 zava.1989.

79.1.8 0. S
2 CID 162232807.  Williams Michael R. 1998. A history of computing technology 
2 nd ed. 
2 nd print. ed.. Los Alamitos Calif. IEEE Computer Soc. p. 56. ISBN 9780818677397.  Nyrop Richard F. ed. 1978. Iran a Country Study. American University Washington D. C.  Foreign Area. pp. 2526.  DTA  Encyclopaedia Iranica. iranicaonline.org.  Darius I Darius the Great King of Persia from 521 BC. 19
02 encyclopedia.com. Retrieved 7 January 2011.  The words are actually inscribed on the frieze of the James A. Farley Post Office Building in the borough of Manhattan in New York City. The inscription is based on Herodotus with George Rawlinson trans. The History of Herodotus New York New York TandyThomas Co. 1909 vol. 4 Book 8  98 p. 147. Archived 8 March 2021 at the Wayback Machine  The Diary of Young Explorers Iran and the Royal Road  SILK ROADS. en.unesco.org. Retrieved 11 April 2020.  Palmira Johnson Brummett Robert R. Edgar Neil J. Hackett Robert R. Edgar Neil J. Hackett 2003. Civilization past  present Volume 1. Longman. p. 38. ISBN 9780321090973.  A history of Greece Volume 2 By Connop Thirlwall Longmans 1836 p. 174  Herodotus VII 59 Archived 29 November 2022 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 84 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 62 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 63 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 64 Archived 29 November 2022 at the Wayback Machine  Chaumont M.L. Albania Archived 10 March 2007 at the Wayback Machine. Encyclopdia Iranica.  Herodotus VII 66 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 67 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 89 Archived 4 August 2020 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 90 Archived 29 November 2022 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 68 Archived 23 July 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 69 Archived 24 July 2020 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 70 Archived 23 July 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 71 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 72 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 73 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 74 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 75 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 77 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 78 Archived 24 July 2020 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 79 Archived 24 July 2020 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 80 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 85 Archived 6 May 2008 at the Wayback Machine  Herodotus VII 65 Archived 23 July 2021 at the Wayback Machine  Hartley Charles W. Yaziciolu G. Bike Smith Adam T. 2012. The Archaeology of Power and Politics in Eurasia Regimes and Revolutions. Cambridge University Press. p. 83. ISBN 9781107016521.  a b Jona Lendering 1997. Immortals. Livius.org. Retrieved 16 May 2009.  Volume IX Encyclopdia Britannica Fifteenth Edition 1983  Potts D. T. 1999. The Archaeology of Elam Formation and Transformation of an Ancient Iranian State. Cambridge University Press. p. 345. ISBN 9780521564960.  Dugaw Sean Lipschits Oded Stiebel Guy 2020. A New Typology of Arrowheads from the Late Iron Age and Persian Period and its Historical Implications. Israel Exploration Journal. 70 1 6489. JSTOR 27100276.  YahalomMack Naama Herzlinger Gadi Bogdanovsky Alexander Tirosh Ofir Garfinkel Yosef Dugaw Sean Lipschits Oded Erel Yigal 2020. Combining chemical and lead isotope analyses with 
3 D geometricmorphometric shape analysis A methodological case study of socketed bronze arrowheads from the southern Levant. Journal of Archaeological Science. 118 105147. Bibcode20
20 JArSc.1
18 j51
47 Y. doi
10.1 0
16 j.jas.20
20.1 05147. S
2 CID 218967765.  Moorey P. R. S. 1980. Cemeteries of the First Millennium B.C. at Deve Hyk near Carchemish salvaged by T. E. Lawrence and C. L. Woolley in 1913. British Archaeological Reports Limited. p. 65. ISBN 9780860541011.  Delrue Parsival 2007. Trilobate Arrowheads at EdDur U.A.E Emirate of Umm AlQaiwain. Arabian Archaeology and Epigraphy. 18 2 239250. doi
10.1 1
11 j.160004
71.2 0
07.0 0281.x.  Collection online arrowhead. British Museum.  Sekunda Nicholas 1992. The Persian Army 560330 BC. Osprey Publishing. p. 30. ISBN 9781855322509.  The Darius Seal. British Museum.  Darius seal photo  Livius. www.livius.org.  a b c d e f g h Kaveh Farrokh 2007. Shadows in the desert ancient Persia at war. Bloomsbury USA. p. 68. ISBN 9781846031083.  Elspeth R.M. Dusinberre 2002. Aspects of empire in Achaemenid Sardis. Cambridge University Press. p. 42. ISBN 9780521810715.  Ehsan YarShater 1982. Encyclopaedia Iranica Volume 4 Issues 58. Routledge  Kegan Paul.  John Manuel Cook 1983. The Persian Empire. Schocken Books.  E.V. Cernenko Angus McBride M.V. Gorelik 24 March 1983. The Scythians 700300 BC. Osprey Publishing. ISBN 9780850454789.  Herodotus 1859. The History of Herodotus a new English version Volume 3. Translated by George Rawlinson Sir Henry Creswicke Rawlinson Sir John Gardner Wilkinson. John Murray. p. 77 Chp. 86.  Waldemar Heckel 2006. Whos who in the age of Alexander the Great prosopography of Alexanders empire. WileyBlackwell. p. 134. ISBN 9781405112109.  DPh  Livius.  Dandamayev Muhammad 2002. Persepolis Elamite Tablets. Encyclopedia Iranica. Archived from the original on 21 January 2012. Retrieved 1 November 2013.  Culture  National Radio TV of Afghanistan. Baztab News. Archived from the original on 8 March 2021. Retrieved 24 May 2020.  Shaked Saul 1987. Aramaic. Encyclopedia Iranica. Vol. 2. New York Routledge  Kegan Paul. pp. 25061 251.  Frye Richard N. Driver G. R. 1955. Review of G.R. Drivers Aramaic Documents of the Fifth Century B.C.. Harvard Journal of Asiatic Studies. 18 34 45661. doi
10.2 3072718444. JSTOR 2718444. p. 457.  Geiger Wilhelm Ernst Kuhn 2002. Grundriss der iranischen Philologie Band I. Abteilung 1. Boston Adamant. pp. 2
49 ff.  Ware James R. Kent Roland G. 1924. The Old Persian Cuneiform Inscriptions of Artaxerxes II and Artaxerxes III. Transactions and Proceedings of the American Philological Association. 55 5261. doi
10.2 307283007. JSTOR 283007. p. 53  Gershevitch Ilya 1964. Zoroasters own contribution. Journal of Near Eastern Studies. 23 1 1238. doi
10.1 086371754. S
2 CID 161954467. p. 20.  Herodotus The Histories Book 1 chapter 133. www.perseus.tufts.edu. Retrieved 21 November 2020.  William W. Malandra 1983. An Introduction to Ancient Iranian Religion Readings from the Avesta and Achaemenid Inscriptions. U of Minnesota Press. ISBN 9780816611140. in the Achaemenid Empire.  Pierre Briant 1 January 2002. From Cyrus to Alexander A History of the Persian Empire. Eisenbrauns. pp. 252. ISBN 9781575061207.  M. A. Dandamaev 1989. A Political History of the Achaemenid Empire. BRILL. pp. 97. ISBN 9789004091726.  A. D. H. Bivar 1998. The Personalities of Mithra in Archaeology and Literature. Bibliotheca Persica Press. ISBN 9780933273283.  Philippa Adrych Robert Bracey Dominic Dalglish Stefanie Lenk Rachel Wood 23 March 2017. Images of Mithra. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780192511119.  Jean Perrot 28 August 2013. The Palace of Darius at Susa The Great Royal Residence of Achaemenid Persia. Bloomsbury Academic. ISBN 9781848856219.  Juri P. Stojanov Yuri Stoyanov 11 August 2000. The Other God Dualist Religions from Antiquity to the Cathar Heresy. Yale University Press. pp. 77. ISBN 9780300082531.  a b Fisher William Bayne Gershevitch I. 1968. The Cambridge History of Iran. Cambridge University Press. p. 412. ISBN 9780521200912.  Book of Ezra  King James Bible. Kingjamesbibletrust.org. Archived from the original on 10 May 2011. Retrieved 21 March 2011.  A. V. Williams Jackson 2003. Zoroastrian Studies The Iranian Religion and Various Monographs 1928. Kessinger Publishing. p. 224. ISBN 9780766166554. OL 80604
99 M.  Virginia Schomp 2009. The Ancient Persians. Marshall Cavendish. p. 24. ISBN 9780761442189.  a b Herodotus I.131  Berosus III.65  a b Herodotus I.132  a b c d e f g h i j k l m Maria Brosius WOMEN i. In PreIslamic Persia Encyclopdia Iranica online edition 2021 available at WOMEN i. In PreIslamic Persia accessed on 26 January 2021. Originally Published January 1 2000. Last Updated March 15 2010. Encyclopdia Iranica online edition New York 1996 httpsiranicaonline.orgarticleswomeni Archived 3 November 2020 at the Wayback Machine  Ctesias frg. 16 56 in Jacoby Fragmente IIIC p. 471  Foundation Encyclopaedia Iranica. Welcome to Encyclopaedia Iranica. iranicaonline.org.  Brosius Maria Women in ancient Persia 559331 BC Oxford 1996. pp. 125182  a b Brosius Maria Women in ancient Persia 559331 BC Oxford 1996. pp. 8393  Heracleides of Cyme apud Athenaeus 5
14 b  Brosius Maria Women in ancient Persia 559331 BC Oxford 1996. pp. 9497  Plutarch Moralia 1
40 B  Charles Henry Caffin 1917. How to study architecture. Dodd Mead and Company. p. 80.  MacDonald Eve 8 January 2020. Irans cultural heritage reflects the grandeur and beauty of the golden age of the Persian empire. The Conversation. Retrieved 15 February 2020.  Edward Lipiski Karel van Lerberghe Antoon Schoors Karel Van Lerberghe Antoon Schoors 1995. Immigration and emigration within the ancient Near East. Peeters Publishers. p. 119. ISBN 9789068317275.  Mastering World History by Philip L. Groisser New York 1970 p. 17  a b Hovannisian Richard G. Sabagh Georges Yrtir Isn 19 November 1998. The Persian Presence in the Islamic World. Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9780521591850.  Margaret Christina Miller 2004. Athens and Persia in the Fifth Century BC A Study in Cultural Receptivity. Cambridge University Press. p. 243. ISBN 9780521607582.  Vesta Sarkhosh Curtis Sarah Stewart 2005. Birth of the Persian Empire. I.B.Tauris. p. 7. ISBN 9781845110628.  George W.F. Hegel 2007. The Philosophy of History. Cosimo. ISBN 9781602064386.  Durant Will. Persia in the History of Civilization PDF. Addressing IranAmerica Society. Mazda Publishers Inc. Archived from the original PDF on 23 July 2011. Sourcesedit Briant Pierre 2002. From Cyrus to Alexander A History of the Persian Empire. Pennsylvania State University Press. ISBN 9781575060316. Brosius Maria 2006. The Persians. Routledge. ISBN 9780415320894. Brosius Maria 2021. A History of Ancient Persia The Achaemenid Empire. WileyBlackwell. ISBN 9781444350920. Heidorn Lisa Ann 1992. The Fortress of Dorginarti and Lower Nubia during the Seventh to Fifth Centuries B.C. PhD. University of Chicago. Howe Timothy Reames Jeanne 2008. Macedonian Legacies Studies in Ancient Macedonian History and Culture in Honor of Eugene N. Borza. Regina Books. ISBN 9781930053564. Kuhrt Amlie 1983. The Cyrus Cylinder and Achaemenid Imperial Policy. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament. 8 25 8397. doi
10.1 177030908928300802507. S
2 CID 170508879. Kuhrt Amlie 2013. The Persian Empire A Corpus of Sources from the Achaemenid Period. Routledge. ISBN 9781136016943. Lavan Myles Payne Richard E. Weisweiler John eds. 2016. Cosmopolitan Politics The Assimilation and Subordination of Elite Cultures. Cosmopolitanism and Empire Universal Rulers Local Elites and Cultural Integration in the Ancient Near East and Mediterranean. Oxford University Press. Tavernier Jan 2007. Iranica in the Achaeamenid Period ca. 550330 B.C. Lexicon of Old Iranian Proper Names and Loanwords Attested in NonIranian Texts. Peeters Publishers. ISBN 9789042918337. Wallinga Herman 1984. The Ionian Revolt. Mnemosyne. 37 34 401437. doi
10.1 1631568525
84 X00619. Wiesehfer Josef 2001. Ancient Persia. Translated by Azodi Azizeh. I.B. Tauris. ISBN 9781860646751. Further readingedit Achenbach Reinhard ed. 2019. Persische Reichspolitik und lokale Heiligtmer. Wiesbaden Harrassowitz Verlag. ISBN 9783447113199. Dandamaev M. A. 1989. A Political History of the Achaemenid Empire. Brill. ISBN 9789004091726. Kosmin Paul J. 2014. The Land of the Elephant Kings Space Territory and Ideology in Seleucid Empire. Harvard University Press. ISBN 9780674728820. Nagel Alexander 2023. Color and meaning in the art of Achaemenid Persia. Cambridge NewYork NY Port Melbourne Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9781009361293. Olmstead Albert T. 1948. History of the Persian Empire. University of Chicago Press. ISBN 9780226627779. External linksedit Wikimedia Commons has media related to Achaemenid Empire. Look up Achaemenid Empire in Wiktionary the free dictionary. Persian History Livius.org on Achaemenids Archived 17 October 2013 at the Wayback Machine ipi The Behistun Inscription Archived 3 March 2016 at the Wayback Machine Livius.org on Achaemenid Royal Inscriptions Archived 18 December 2016 at the Wayback Machine Achaemenid art on Iran Chamber Society www.iranchamber.com Photos of the tribute bearers from the 23 satrapies of the Achaemenid empire from Persepolis Coins medals and orders of the Persian empire Archived 26 January 2021 at the Wayback Machine Dynasty Achaemenid Iran The Forgotten Glory  Documentary Film About Ancient Iran achaemenids  Sassanids Archived 28 April 2010 at the Wayback Machine Achemenet an electronic resource for the study of the history literature and archaeology of the Persian Empire Persepolis Before Incursion Virtual tour project Muse achmnide virtuel et interactif Mavi a Virtual Interactive Achemenide Museum of more than 8000 items of the Persian Empire Persian history in detail Swedish Contributions to the Archaeology of Iran Archived 22 July 2021 at the Wayback Machine Artikel i Fornvnnen 2007 by Carl Nylander v t e Achaemenid Empire History Family tree Timeline History of democracy Art Achaemenid Persian Lion Rhyton Oxus Treasure Achaemenid coinage Apadana hoard Danake Daric Architecture Persepolis Apadana Gate of All Nations Tachara Palace of Darius in Susa Tomb of Cyrus Persian column Naqshe Rostam Kabaye Zartosht Mausoleum at Halicarnassus Tombs at Xanthos Harpy Tomb Nereid Monument Tomb of Payava Culture Old Persian cuneiform Old Persian Behistun Inscription Xerxes Is inscription at Van Ganjnameh Cyrus Cylinder Warfare Persian Revolt Battle of Hyrba Battle of the Persian Border LydianPersian Wars Battle of Pteria Battle of Thymbra Siege of Sardis 547 BC Battle of Opis Conquest of the Indus Valley First conquest of Egypt Scythian campaign of Darius I GrecoPersian Wars Ionian Revolt Siege of Naxos 499 BC Battle of Lade Siege of Eretria Battle of Marathon Battle of Thermopylae Battle of Artemisium Destruction of Athens Battle of Salamis Battle of Plataea Battle of Mycale Babylonian revolts Wars of the Delian League Battle of the Eurymedon Peloponnesian War Battle of Cyzicus Battle of Cunaxa Corinthian War Battle of Cnidus Great Satraps Revolt Second conquest of Egypt Wars of Alexander the Great Battle of the Granicus Siege of Miletus Siege of Halicarnassus Battle of Issus Siege of Tyre 332 BC Siege of Gaza Battle of Gaugamela Battle of the Persian Gate Diplomacy Earth and water Peace of Callias Peace of Antalcidas Administration Capitals Pasargadae Ecbatana Babylon Susa Satrapies Armenia Districts of the Empire Persepolis Administrative Archives Royal Road Chapar Khaneh Angarium Angarum Dynasties Achaemenid Pharnacid Mithridatic Pontus Ariarathid Cappadocia Orontid Armenia Seven Achaemenid clans Related 25
00 year celebration of the Persian Empire Xanthian Obelisk Cappadocian calendar v t e Provinces of the Achaemenid Empire Behistun  Persepolis  Naqshe Rustam  Susa  Daeva inscriptions Akaufaka Quhistan Amyrgoi Arabia Arachosia Aria Armenia Assyria Babylonia Bactria Cappadocia Caria Carmania Chorasmia Cilicia Colchis Dahae Drangiana 
1 st Egypt  
2 nd Egypt EberNari Levant Elam Kush Nubia Gandra Gandhara Gedrosia Hyrcania Ionia Hindush Libya Lydia Maka Margiana Media Massagetae Parthia Persis Phoenicia Phrygia Hellespontine Phrygia Greater Phrygia Saka Samaritan Province Sattagydia Skudra Thrace Sogdia Yehud See also Taxation districts of the Achaemenid Empire according to Herodotus v t e Timeline of Mesopotamia Northwestern Mesopotamia Northern Mesopotamia Southern Mesopotamia c. 35002350 BCE Late Chalcolithic 45  Early Jezirah 13 Uruk period  Jemdet Nasr period  Early Dynastic period c. 23502200 BCE Akkadian Empire c. 22002100 BCE Gutians c. 21002000 BCE Third Dynasty of Ur c. 20001800 BCE Mari and other Amorite citystates Old Assyrian period IsinLarsa and other Amorite citystates c. 18001600 BCE Old Hittite Kingdom Old Babylonian Empire Southern Akkadians c. 16001400 BCE Mitanni Hurrians Kardunia Kassites c. 14001200 BCE Middle Hittite Kingdom Middle Assyria c. 12001150 BCE Bronze Age Collapse Sea Peoples Arameans c. 1150911 BCE Phoenicia NeoHittite citystates Aram Damascus Arameans Middle Babylonia Chal de ans 911729 BCE NeoAssyrian Empire 729609 BCE 626539 BCE NeoBabylonian Empire Chaldeans 539331 BCE Achaemenid Empire 336301 BCE Macedonian Empire Ancient Greeks and Macedonians 311129 BCE Seleucid Empire 12963 BCE Seleucid Empire Parthian Empire 63 BCE224 CE Ancient Rome  Byzantine Empire Syria 2
24 mid 
7 C Sassanid Empire v t e Empires Ancient Colonies Akkadian NeoSumerian Assyrian Middle Assyrian NeoAssyrian Babylonian Old Babylonian Kassite NeoBabylonian Chinese Qin Han Jin Dmt Egyptian Old Kingdom Middle Kingdom New Kingdom Goguryeo Harsha Hellenistic Macedonian Seleucid Ptolemaic Bactrian IndoGreek Hittite Hunnic White Xiongnu Iranian Median Achaemenid Parthian Sasanian Kush Kushan Magadha Haryanka Shaishunaga Nanda Maurya Shunga Gupta Phoenician Carthaginian Roman Western Eastern Satavahana Xianbei Nirun Postclassical Aragonese Angevin Ayyubid Aztec Benin Bornu Bruneian Bulgarian First Second Burmese First Calakmul Caliphate Rashidun Umayyad Abbasid Fatimid Chalukya Western Eastern Chinese Sui Tang Liao Song Jn Yuan Chola Ethiopian Aksum Zagwe Solomonic Genoese Georgian Huetar Inca Kannauj Pala GurjaraPratihara Rashtrakuta Iranian Tahirid Saffarid Samanid Buyid Japanese Yamato Kamakura Muromachi Edo Kanem Khmer Latin Majapahit Mali Mongol Yuan Golden Horde Chagatai Khanate Ilkhanate Moroccan Idrisid Almoravid Almohad North Sea Oyo Hellenic Roman Byzantine Nicaea Thessalonica Trebizond Epirus Morea RomanoGermanic Carolingian Holy Roman Serbian Singhasari Songhai Srivijaya Tibetan Tikal Tiwanaku Toltec TurcoPersian Ghaznavid Great Seljuk Khwarezmian Timurid Turkic First Western Eastern Second Venetian Vietnamese Dinh Early Le Ly Tran Ho Later Tran Later Le Vijayanagara Wagadou Wari Modern Afghan Ashanti Austrian AustroHungarian Brazilian Burmese Second Third Central African Chinese Ming Qing China Manchukuo Ethiopian Haitian First Second French First Second German German Empire Nazi Germany Indian IndoPersian Mughal Sikh Iranian Safavid Afsharid Zand Qajar Pahlavi Japanese Korean Maratha Mexican First Second Mongol Oirat Khoshut Dzungar Kalmyk Bogd Moroccan Saadi Alawi Ottoman Russian Tsarist Imperial Sokoto Tongan Vietnamese Mac Revival Le Tay son Dainam Vietnam Colonial American Belgian British English Scottish Chinese Danish Dutch French German Italian Japanese Mongol Omani PolishLithuanian Couronian Portuguese Russian Spanish Swedish Lists Empires largest Ancient great powers Medieval great powers Modern great powers European colonialism African empires Miscellaneous Empire as a description of foreign policy American Empire Soviet empire v t e Iran topics History Prehistory Ancient 3400539 BC KuraAraxes culture 34002000 BC ProtoElamite civilization 31002700 BC Elamite dynasties 2700540 BC Akkadian Empire c.2334 BCc.2154 BC Lullubi c.2300675 BC Kassites c.15
95 c.1155 BC Kingdom of Mannai 
10 th
7 th century BC NeoAssyrian Empire 911609 BC Urartu 860 BC590 BC Median Empire 678549 BC Scythian Kingdom 652625 BC NeoBabylonian Empire 626539 BC 550 BCAD 224 Achaemenid Empire 550330 BC Atropatene c.323 BCAD 226 Kingdom of Armenia 321 BCAD 428 Kingdom of Cappadocia 3
20 s BCAD 17 Seleucid Empire 31263 BC Frataraka c.295220 BC Kingdom of Pontus 281 BCAD 62 Parthian Empire 247 BCAD 224 Kings of Persis after 132 BCAD 224 AD 224651 Sasanian Empire AD 224651 Medieval and early modern 6321090 Rashidun Caliphate 632661 Umayyad Caliphate 661750 Abbasid Caliphate 7501258 Samanid dynasty 819999 Tahirid dynasty 821873 Alavid dynasty 864928 Saffarid dynasty 8611003 Ziyarid dynasty 9311090 Buyid dynasty 9341062 9771432 Ghaznavid Empire 9771186 Ghurid dynasty 10111215 Seljuk Empire 10371194 Anushtegin dynasty 10771231 Eldiguzids 1135361225 Kart dynasty 12441381 Ilkhanate 12561335 Muzaffarid dynasty 13141393 Jalayirid Sultanate dynasty 13351432 Chobanid dynasty 13381357 13701925 Timurid Empire 13701507 Qara Qoyunlu Turcomans 13741468 Aq Qoyunlu Turcomans 13781508 Safavid Empire 15011736 Afsharid Empire 17361796 Zand Dynasty 17511794 Qajar Empire 17891925 Khanates of the Caucasus 
18 th
20 th centuries Persian Constitutional Revolution 19051911 1908 bombardment of the Majlis Kurdish separatism in Iran 1918 1921 Persian coup dtat Arab separatism in Khuzestan 19222020 Modern 19251979 Pahlavi dynasty 19251979 Shatt alArab dispute 19361975 Iran crisis of 1946 Insurgency in Balochistan 1948 1949 Iranian Constituent Assembly election 1953 coup dtat Iranian Revolution 1979 Islamic Republic 19
79 present History 1979 Interim Government 1979 March 1979 Iranian Islamic Republic referendum 1979 Khuzestan insurgency Iran hostage crisis 19791981 December 1979 Iranian constitutional referendum Iranian Embassy siege 1980 Nojeh coup plot 1980 IranIraq War 198088 Interim Government of Iran 1981 1987 Mecca incident Iran Air Flight 655 shootdown 1988 KDPI insurgency 19891996 PJAK conflict 2004 2009 Iranian presidential election protests Syrian civil war 2011 International military intervention against the Islamic State 2014 Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action 2015 United States withdrawal 2018 20172018 Iranian protests 20182019 Iranian general strikes and protests COVID19 pandemic 2019 Sistan and Baluchestan protests 20192020 Iranian protests 2021 Sistan and Baluchestan protests 20212022 Iranian protests See also Ancient Persians Greater Iran Persianization Persianate society TurcoPersian IndoPersian Iranic peoples languages Jiroft culture Aryans Azerbaijanis Peoples of the Caucasus Persians Monarchs of Persia Heads of state of Iran History of democracy in classical Iran Military history Electric history Years in Iran Geography Borders Cities largest twin towns and sister cities Earthquakes Environmental issues Climate change Iranian Azerbaijan Iranian Balochistan Caspian Hyrcanian mixed forests Caucasus Iranian Kurdistan Iranian plateau Lake Urmia Islands Mountains Provinces Wildlife Politics General Censorship Constitution Persian Constitutional Revolution Corruption Elections 2009 presidential Foreign relations Government of the Islamic Republic of Iran Human rights Childrens rights LGBT Womens rights Judicial system Military Army Air Force Navy Ministry of Intelligence Cyberwarfare Nuclear program UN Security Council Resolution 1747 Political parties Principlists Propaganda Reformists Terrorism statesponsorship allegations White Revolution 1963 Womens rights movement Councils Assembly or Council of Experts Expediency Discernment Council Guardian Council Islamic Consultative Assembly parliament Local councils Supreme National Security Council Officials Ambassadors President Provincial governors Supreme Leader Economy General Bonyad charitable trust Brain drain Companies Automotive industry Corruption Economic Cooperation Organization ECO Economic history Economic Reform Plan Energy Environmental issues Foreign direct investment Intellectual property International oil bourse International rankings Iran and the World Trade Organization Taxation Main economic laws Economy of the Middle East Milad Tower and complex Military equipment manufactured Nuclear program UN Security Council Resolution 1747 Privatization Rial currency Space Agency Setad Supreme Audit Court Tehran Stock Exchange Venture capital Technology startups Sectors Agriculture fruit Banking and insurance Central Bank Shetab Banking System Construction Defense Health care Pharmaceuticals Industry Mining Petroleum AngloPersian Oil Company Telecommunications and IT TCI Transport airlines metro railways shipping Tourism Stateowned companies Defense Industries Organization DIO Industrial Development and Renovation Organization IDRO Iran Aviation Industries Organization IAIO Iran Electronics Industries IEI National Iranian Oil Company NIOC National Development Fund Places Asaluyeh industrial corridor Chabahar Free TradeIndustrial Zone Kish Island Free Trade Zone Research centers Society Demographics Languages Persian Farsi Armenian Azerbaijani Kurdish Hebrew Georgian NeoAramaic Iranian languages Peoples Iranian citizens abroad Ethnic minorities Armenians Assyrians Azerbaijanis Circassians Georgians Kurds Jews Turkmen Religion Islam Bah Faith persecution Christianity Zoroastrians persecution Freedom of religion Other Corruption Crime Education higher scientists and scholars universities International rankings Nationality Water supply and sanitation Women Culture Architecture Achaemenid architects Art modern  contemporary Astronomy Blogs Calendars Persian New Year Nowruz Fashion Chicago Persian antiquities dispute Cinema Cuisine wine Folklore Intellectual movements Iranians Iranian studies Islam Islamization Literature Media news agencies student newspapers Mythology National Jewels National symbols Imperial Anthem Opium consumption Persian gardens Persian name Philosophy Public holidays Scouting Sport football Music Folk Jazz Pop Rap and hiphop Rock Traditional Ey Iran Other topics Science and technology AntiIranian sentiment Tehrangeles Category Portal WikiProject Commons v t e Rulers of the Ancient Near East Territories dates 12345 Egypt Canaan Ebla Mari Kish Assur Akshak Akkad Uruk Adab Umma Lagash Ur Elam 40003200 BCE Naqada I Naqada II EgyptMesopotamia relations PreDynastic period 40002900 BCE Susa I Uruk period 40003100 BCE Anu Ziggurat 4000 BCE Anonymous Kingpriests Susa II Uruk influence or control 32003100 BCE ProtoDynastic period Naqada III Early or legendary kings Upper Egypt Finger Snail Fish PenAbu Animal Stork Canide Bull Scorpion I Shendjw IryHor Ka Scorpion II Narmer  Menes Lower Egypt Hedju Hor NyHor Hsekiu Khayu Tiu Thesh Neheb Wazner NatHor Mekh Double Falcon Wash 31002900 BCE Early Dynastic Period First Dynasty of Egypt Narmer Palette Narmer Menes Neithhotep regent HorAha Djer Djet Merneith regent Den Anedjib Semerkhet Qaa Sneferka Horus Bird Canaanites Jemdet Nasr period 31002900 BCE ProtoElamite period Susa III 31002700 BCE 2900 BCE Second Dynasty of Egypt Hotepsekhemwy NebraRaneb Nynetjer Ba Nubnefer Horus Sa WenegNebty Wadjenes Senedj SethPeribsen SekhemibPerenmaat Neferkara I Neferkasokar Hudjefa I Khasekhemwy Early Dynastic Period I 29002700 BCE First Eblaite Kingdom First kingdom of Mari Kish I dynasty Jushur Kullassinabel Nangishlishma Entarahana Babum Puannum Kalibum 2800 BCE Kalumum Zuqaqip Atab Mashda Arwium Etana Balih Enmenuna MelemKish Barsalnuna Uruk I dynasty Meshkianggasher Enmerkar conqueror of Aratta 2700 BCE Early Dynastic Period II 27002600 BCE Zamug Tizqar Ilku Iltasadum Lugalbanda Dumuzid the Fisherman Enmebaragesi made the land of Elam submit6 Aga of Kish Gilgamesh Old Elamite period 27001500 BCE IndusMesopotamia relations 2600 BCE Third Dynasty of Egypt Djoser First Egyptian pyramids Sekhemkhet Sanakht Nebka Khaba Qahedjet Huni Early Dynastic Period III 26002340 BCE Sagisu Aburlim Agurlim IbbiDamu BabaDamu Kish II dynasty 5 kings Uhub Mesilim UrNungal Udulkalama Labashum Lagash Enhegal Lugal shaengur Ur AImdugud UrPabilsag Meskalamdug Queen Puabi Akalamdug Enundaraanna Meshe Melamanna Lugalkitun Adab Ninkisalsi Medurba Lugaldalu 2575 BCE Old Kingdom of Egypt Fourth Dynasty of Egypt Snefru Khufu Djedefre Khafre Bikheris Menkaure Shepseskaf Thamphthis Ur I dynasty Mesannepada King of Ur and Kish victorious over Uruk 2500 BCE Phoenicia 2500539 BCE Second kingdom of Mari IkunShamash IkuShamagan Ansud Saumu IshtupIshar IkunMari IblulIl Nizi Kish III dynasty KuBaba Akshak dynasty Unzi Undalulu Uruk II dynasty Ensha kushanna Mugsi Umma I dynasty Pabilgagaltuku Lagash I dynasty UrNanshe Akurgal Aannepada Meskiagnun Elulu Balulu Awan dynasty Peli Tata Ukkutahesh Hishur 2450 BCE Fifth Dynasty of Egypt Userkaf Sahure Neferirkare Kakai Neferefre Shepseskare Nyuserre Ini Menkauhor Kaiu Djedkare Isesi Unas EnarDamu IsharMalik Ush Enakalle Elamite invasions 3 kings6 Shushun tarana Napilhush 2425 BCE KunDamu Eannatum King of Lagash Sumer Akkad conqueror of Elam 2400 BCE AdubDamu IgrishHalam IrkabDamu Kish IV dynasty PuzurSuen UrZababa Urur Lugalkinishedudu Lugalkisalsi Eiginimpae Meskigal UrLumma Il Gishakidu Queen Barairnun Enannatum Entemena Enannatum II Enentarzi Ur II dynasty Nanni MeshkiangNanna II Kikusiwetempti 2380 BCE Sixth Dynasty of Egypt Teti Userkare Pepi I Merenre Nemtyemsaf I Pepi II Merenre Nemtyemsaf II Netjerkare Siptah Adab dynasty Lugalannemundu King of the four quarters of the world 2370 BCE IsarDamu EnnaDagan IkunIshar IshqiMari Invasion by Mari Anbu Anba Bazi Zizi of Mari Limer Sharrumiter6 Ukush Lugalanda Urukagina Luhishan 2350 BCE PuzurNirah IshuIl ShuSin Uruk III dynasty Lugalzagesi Governor of Umma King of all Sumer 2340 BCE Akkadian Period 23402150 BCE Akkadian Empire Sargon of Akkad Rimush Manishtushu Akkadian Governors Eshpum Ilshurabi Epirmupi Iliishmani 2250 BCE NaramSin Lugalushumgal vassal of the Akkadians 2200 BCE First Intermediate Period Seventh Dynasty of Egypt Eighth Dynasty of Egypt Menkare Neferkare II Neferkare Neby Djedkare Shemai Neferkare Khendu Merenhor Neferkamin Nikare Neferkare Tereru Neferkahor Neferkare Pepiseneb Neferkamin Anu Qakare Ibi Neferkaure Neferkauhor Neferirkare Second Eblaite Kingdom Third kingdom of Mari Shakkanakku dynasty Ididish ShuDagan IshmaDagan Vassals of the Akkadians SharKaliSharri Igigi Imi Nanum Ilulu 3 years Dudu Shuturul Uruk IV dynasty Urnigin Urgigir Lagash II dynasty PuzerMama UrNingirsu I Pirigme LuBaba Lugula Kaku HishepRatep Helu Khita PuzurInshushinak 2150 BCE Ninth Dynasty of Egypt Meryibre Khety Neferkare VII Nebkaure Khety Setut Ur III period 21502000 BCE NrMr IshtupIlum IshgumAddu Apilkin Gutian dynasty 21 kings Laerabum Sium Kuda Uruk Puzurili UrUtu Umma II dynasty Lugalannatum vassal of the Gutians UrBaba Gudea UrNingirsu Urgar Nammahani Tirigan 2125 BCE Tenth Dynasty of Egypt Meryhathor Neferkare VIII Wahkare Khety Merykare Uruk V dynasty Utuhengal 2100 BCE Vassals of UR III Iddiilum IliIshar TuraDagan PuzurIshtar Vassals of Ur III7 Ur III dynasty Kings of Ur Sumer and Akkad UrNammu Shulgi AmarSin ShuSin 20251763 BCE Amorite invasions IbbiSin Elamite invasions Kindattu Shimashki Dynasty Middle Kingdom of Egypt Eleventh Dynasty of Egypt Mentuhotep I Intef I Intef II Intef III Mentuhotep II Mentuhotep III Mentuhotep IV Third Eblaite Kingdom Amorites IbbitLim Immeya Indilimma Amorite Shakkanakkus HitialErra HanunDagan ... Lim Dynasty of Mari Amorites YaggidLim YahdunLim YasmahAdad ZimriLim Queen Shibtu Old Assyria PuzurAshur I Shalimahum Ilushuma Erishum I Ikunum Sargon I PuzurAshur II NaramSin Erishum II IsinLarsa period Amorites Dynasty of Isin IshbiErra ShuIlishu IddinDagan IshmeDagan LipitEshtar UrNinurta BurSuen LipitEnlil Erraimitti Enlilbani Zambiya Iterpisha Urdukuga Suenmagir Damiqilishu Dynasty of Larsa Naplanum Emisum Samium Zabaia Gungunum Abisare Sumuel NurAdad SinIddinam SinEribam SinIqisham SilliAdad WaradSin RimSin I ... RimSin II Uruk VI dynasty Alilahadum Sumubinasa NaramSin of Uruk Snkid Sniribam Sngmil Ilumgamil Anam of Uruk Irdanene RimAnum Nabiiliu Sukkalmah dynasty SiwePalarKhuppak Twelfth Dynasty of Egypt Amenemhat I Senusret I Amenemhat II Senusret II Senusret III Amenemhat III Amenemhat IV Sobekneferu 18001595 BCE Thirteenth Dynasty of Egypt Fourteenth Dynasty of Egypt Abraham Biblical Kings of Byblos Kings of Tyre Kings of Sidon Yamhad Yamhad dynasty Amorites Old Assyria ShamshiAdad dynasty 18081736 BCE Amorites ShamshiAdad I IshmeDagan I MutAshkur Rimush Asinum Ashurdugul Ashuraplaidi NasirSin Sinnamir IpqiIshtar Adadsalulu Adasi Nondynastic usurpers 17351701 BCE PuzurSin Ashurdugul Ashuraplaidi NasirSin Sinnamir IpqiIshtar Adadsalulu Adasi Adaside dynasty 1700722 BCE Belbani Libaya SharmaAdad I IptarSin Bazaya Lullaya ShuNinua SharmaAdad II Erishum III ShamshiAdad II IshmeDagan II ShamshiAdad III Ashurnirari I PuzurAshur III Enlilnasir I Nurili Ashurshaduni Ashurrabi I Ashurnadinahhe I EnlilNasir II Ashurnirari II Ashurbelnisheshu Ashurrimnisheshu Ashurnadinahhe II First Babylonian dynasty Old Babylonian Period Amorites Sumuabum SumulaEl SinmuballitSabium ApilSin Sinmuballit Hammurabi Samsuiluna Abieshuh Ammiditana Ammisaduqa SamsuDitana Early Kassite rulers Second Babylonian dynasty Sealand Dynasty Ilummaili Ittiilinibi Damqiilishu Ishkibal Shushushi Gulkishar mDIUEN Peshgaldaramesh Ayadaragalama Akurduana Melamkurkurra Eagamil Second Intermediate Period Sixteenth Dynasty Abydos Dynasty Seventeenth Dynasty Fifteenth Dynasty of Egypt Hyksos Pharaoh Ahmose I slaying a Hyksos Semqen AperAnati SakirHar Khyan Apepi Khamudi Mitanni 16001260 BCE Kirta Shuttarna I Parshatatar 15311155 BCE Tutankhamun New Kingdom of Egypt Eighteenth Dynasty of Egypt Ahmose I Amenhotep I Third Babylonian dynasty Kassites AgumKakrime Burnaburiash I Kashtiliash III Ulamburiash Agum III Karaindash Kadashmanharbe I Kurigalzu I KadashmanEnlil I Burnaburiash II Karahardash NaziBugash Kurigalzu II NaziMaruttash KadashmanTurgu KadashmanEnlil II KudurEnlil ShagaraktiShuriash Kashtiliashu IV Enlilnadinshumi KadashmanHarbe II Adadshumaiddina Adadshumausur MeliShipak II Mardukaplaiddina I Zababashumaiddin Enlilnadinahi Middle Elamite period 15001100 BCE Kidinuid dynasty Igehalkid dynasty UntashNapirisha Thutmose I Thutmose II Hatshepsut Thutmose III Amenhotep II Thutmose IV Amenhotep III Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb Hittite Empire Ugarit Nineteenth Dynasty of Egypt Ramesses I Seti I Ramesses II Merneptah Amenmesses Seti II Siptah Twosret Elamite Empire Shutrukid dynasty ShutrukNakhunte 11551025 BCE Twentieth Dynasty of Egypt Setnakhte Ramesses III Ramesses IV Ramesses V Ramesses VI Ramesses VII Ramesses VIII Ramesses IX Ramesses X Ramesses XI Third Intermediate Period Twentyfirst Dynasty of Egypt Smendes Amenemnisu Psusennes I Amenemope Osorkon the Elder Siamun Psusennes II Phoenicia Kings of Byblos Kings of Tyre Kings of Sidon Kingdom of Israel Saul Ishbosheth David Solomon SyroHittite states Middle Assyria EribaAdad I Ashuruballit I Enlilnirari Arikdenili Adadnirari I Shalmaneser I TukultiNinurta I Ashurnadinapli Ashurnirari III Enlilkudurriusur NinurtaapalEkur Ashurdan I NinurtatukultiAshur MutakkilNusku Ashurreshishi I TiglathPileser I AsharidapalEkur Ashurbelkala EribaAdad II ShamshiAdad IV Ashurnasirpal I Shalmaneser II Ashurnirari IV Ashurrabi II Ashurreshishi II TiglathPileser II Ashurdan II Fourth Babylonian dynasty Second Dynasty of Isin Mardukkabitahheshu IttiMardukbalatu Ninurtanadinshumi Nebuchadnezzar I Enlilnadinapli Marduknadinahhe Mardukshapikzeri Adadaplaiddina Mardukahheeriba MardukzerX Nabushumlibur NeoElamite period 1100540 BCE 1025934 BCE Fifth Sixth Seventh Eighth Babylonian dynasties Period of Chaos Simbarshipak Eamukinzeri Kashshunadinahi Eulmashshakinshumi Ninurtakudurriusur I Shiriktishuqamuna Marbitiaplausur Nabmukinapli 911745 BCE Twentysecond Dynasty of Egypt Shoshenq I Osorkon I Shoshenq II Takelot I Osorkon II Shoshenq III Shoshenq IV Pami Shoshenq V Pedubast II Osorkon IV Twentythird Dynasty of Egypt Harsiese A Takelot II Pedubast I Shoshenq VI Osorkon III Takelot III Rudamun Menkheperre Ini Twentyfourth Dynasty of Egypt Tefnakht Bakenranef Kingdom of Samaria Kingdom of Judah NeoAssyrian Empire Adadnirari II TukultiNinurta II Ashurnasirpal II Shalmaneser III ShamshiAdad V Shammuramat regent Adadnirari III Shalmaneser IV AshurDan III Ashurnirari V Ninth Babylonian Dynasty Ninurtakudurriusur II Marbitiahheiddina Shamashmudammiq Nabushumaukin I Nabuaplaiddina Mardukzakirshumi I Mardukbalassuiqbi Babaahaiddina five kings NinurtaaplaX Mardukbelzeri Mardukaplausur EribaMarduk Nabushumaishkun Nabonassar Nabunadinzeri Nabushumaukin II Nabumukinzeri HumbanTahrid dynasty Urtak Teumman Ummanigash Tammaritu I Indabibi Humbanhaltash III 745609 BCE Twentyfifth Dynasty of Egypt Taharqa Black Pharaohs Piye Shebitku Shabaka Taharqa Tanutamun NeoAssyrian Empire Sargonid dynasty TiglathPileser Shalmaneser Mardukaplaiddina II Sargon Sennacherib Mardukzakirshumi II Mardukaplaiddina II Belibni Ashurnadinshumi Nergalushezib MushezibMarduk Esarhaddon Ashurbanipal Ashuretililani Sinsharishkun Sinshumulishir Ashuruballit II Assyrian conquest of Egypt Assyrian conquest of Elam 626539 BCE Late Period Twentysixth Dynasty of Egypt Necho I Psamtik I Necho II Psamtik II Wahibre Ahmose II Psamtik III NeoBabylonian Empire Nabopolassar Nebuchadnezzar II AmelMarduk Neriglissar LabashiMarduk Nabonidus Median Empire Deioces Phraortes Madyes Cyaxares Astyages 539331 BCE Twentyseventh Dynasty of Egypt First Achaemenid conquest of Egypt Kings of Byblos Kings of Tyre Kings of Sidon Achaemenid Empire Cyrus Cambyses Darius I Xerxes Artaxerxes I Darius II Artaxerxes II Artaxerxes III Artaxerxes IV Darius III Twentyeighth Dynasty of Egypt Twentyninth Dynasty of Egypt Thirtieth Dynasty of Egypt Thirtyfirst Dynasty of Egypt 331141 BCE Argead dynasty and Ptolemaic Egypt Ptolemy I Soter Ptolemy Keraunos Ptolemy II Philadelphus Arsinoe II Ptolemy III Euergetes Berenice II Euergetis Ptolemy IV Philopator Arsinoe III Philopator Ptolemy V Epiphanes Cleopatra I Syra Ptolemy VI Philometor Ptolemy VII Neos Philopator Cleopatra II Philometor Soter Ptolemy VIII Physcon Cleopatra III Ptolemy IX Lathyros Cleopatra IV Ptolemy X Alexander Berenice III Ptolemy XI Alexander Ptolemy XII Auletes Cleopatra V Cleopatra VI Tryphaena Berenice IV Epiphanea Ptolemy XIII Ptolemy XIV Cleopatra VII Philopator Ptolemy XV Caesarion Arsinoe IV Hellenistic Period Seleukos I Nikator Tetradrachm from Babylon Argead dynasty Alexander III Philip III Alexander IV Antigonid dynasty Antigonus I Seleucid Empire Seleucus I Antiochus I Antiochus II Seleucus II Seleucus III Antiochus III Seleucus IV Antiochus IV Antiochus V Demetrius I Alexander III Demetrius II Antiochus VI Dionysus Diodotus Tryphon Antiochus VII Sidetes 14130 BCE Kingdom of Judea Simon Thassi John Hyrcanus Aristobulus I Alexander Jannaeus Salome Alexandra Hyrcanus II Aristobulus II Antigonus II Mattathias Alexander II Zabinas Seleucus V Philometor Antiochus VIII Grypus Antiochus IX Cyzicenus Seleucus VI Epiphanes Antiochus X Eusebes Antiochus XI Epiphanes Demetrius III Eucaerus Philip I Philadelphus Antiochus XII Dionysus Antiochus XIII Asiaticus Philip II Philoromaeus Parthian Empire Mithridates I Phraates Hyspaosines Artabanus Mithridates II Gotarzes Mithridates III Orodes I Sinatruces Phraates III Mithridates IV Orodes II Phraates IV Tiridates II Musa Phraates V Orodes III Vonones I Artabanus II Tiridates III Artabanus II Vardanes I Gotarzes II Meherdates Vonones II Vologases I Vardanes II Pacorus II Vologases II Artabanus III Osroes I 30 BCE116 CE Roman Empire Roman conquest of Egypt Province of Egypt Judea Syria 116117 CE Province of Mesopotamia under Trajan Parthamaspates of Parthia 117224 CE Syria Palaestina Province of Mesopotamia Sinatruces II Mithridates V Vologases IV Osroes II Vologases V Vologases VI Artabanus IV 224270 CE Sasanian Empire Province of Asoristan Coin of Ardashir I Hamadan mint. Ardashir I Shapur I Hormizd I Bahram I Bahram II Bahram III Narseh Hormizd II Adur Narseh Shapur II Ardashir II Shapur III Bahram IV Yazdegerd I Shapur IV Khosrow Bahram V Yazdegerd II Hormizd III Peroz I Balash Kavad I Jamasp Kavad I Khosrow I Hormizd IV Khosrow II Bahram VI Chobin Vistahm 270273 CE Palmyrene Empire Vaballathus Zenobia Antiochus 273395 CE Roman Empire Province of Egypt Syria Palaestina Syria Province of Mesopotamia 395618 CE Byzantine Empire Byzantine Egypt Palaestina Prima Palaestina Secunda Byzantine Syria Byzantine Mesopotamia 618628 CE Sasanian conquest of Egypt Province of Egypt Shahrbaraz Sahralanyozan Shahrbaraz Sasanian Empire Province of Asoristan Khosrow II Kavad II 628641 CE Byzantine Empire Ardashir III Shahrbaraz Khosrow III Boran Shapuri Shahrvaraz Azarmidokht Farrukh Hormizd Hormizd VI Khosrow IV Boran Yazdegerd III Peroz III Narsieh Byzantine Egypt Palaestina Prima Palaestina Secunda Byzantine Syria Byzantine Mesopotamia 639651 CE Muslim conquest of Egypt Muslim conquest of the Levant Muslim conquest of Mesopotamia and Persia Chronology of the Neolithic period Rulers of Ancient Central Asia  Rulers with names in italics are considered fictional.  Hallo W. Simpson W. 1971. The Ancient Near East. New York Harcourt Brace Jovanovich. pp. 4849.  Rulers of Mesopotamia. cdli.ox.ac.uk. University of Oxford CNRS.  Thomas Ariane Potts Timothy 2020. Mesopotamia Civilization Begins. Getty Publications. p. 14. ISBN 9781606066492.  Roux Georges 1992. Ancient Iraq. Penguin Books Limited. pp. 532534 Chronological Tables. ISBN 9780141938257.  a b c Per Sumerian King List  Unger Merrill F. 2014. Israel and the Aramaeans of Damascus A Study in Archaeological Illumination of Bible History. Wipf and Stock Publishers. p. 5. ISBN 9781625646064. Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleAchaemenidEmpireoldid1220567458 Categories Achaemenid Empire 3
30 s BC 5
50 s BC 
4 th century BC in Iran 
5 th century BC in Iran 
6 th century BC in Iran Countries in ancient Africa Empires and kingdoms of Iran Former empires in Africa Former empires in Asia Former monarchies of Europe Historical transcontinental empires History of Eastern Europe History of North Africa History of the Middle East History of South Asia History of West Asia History of Zoroastrianism Iron Age countries in Asia Iron Age countries in Europe Monarchy in Persia and Iran Patronymics States and territories established in the 
6 th century BC States and territories disestablished in the 
4 th century BC Former empires Hidden categories Pages with nonnumeric formatnum arguments Pages using the EasyTimeline extension All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from January 2018 Webarchive template wayback links CS1 maint location missing publisher Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the 1911 Encyclopaedia Britannica with Wikisource reference Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Wikipedia indefinitely moveprotected pages Use dmy dates from August 2021 Use Oxford spelling from November 2022 Articles containing Old Persian ca. 600400 B.C.language text Pages using infobox country or infobox former country with the flag caption or type parameters Articles containing explicitly cited Englishlanguage text Articles with unsourced statements from July 2022 Articles with unsourced statements from July 2021 Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images Commons category link is on Wikidata Articles which contain graphical timelines This page was last edited on 24 April 2024 at 1622 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width